{"Retroperitoneal fibrosis": {"description": "Retroperitoneal fibrosis is a rare disorder that blocks the tubes (ureters) that carry urine from the kidneys to the bladder.", "Possible Complications": "The disorder may lead to:Ongoing blockage of the the tubes leading from the kidney on one or both sides, Chronic kidney failure. ", "Symptoms": ["Dull pain in the abdomen that increases with time", "Pain and change of color in the legs (due to decreased blood flow)", "Swelling of one leg", "Decreased urine output", "No urine output (anuria)", "Nausea, vomiting, changes in thinking caused by kidney failure and build-up of toxic chemicals in the blood", "Severe abdominal pain with hemorrhaging (due to death of intestinal tissue)"], "Exams and Tests": "Abdominal CT scan is the best way to find a retroperitoneal mass.Other tests that can help diagnose this condition include:BUN and creatinine blood tests, Intravenous pyelogram (IVP) - not as commonly used, Kidney ultrasound, MRI of the abdomen, CAT scan of the abdomen and\u00a0retroperitoneum\u00a0. A biopsy of the mass may also be done to rule out cancer. ", "Treatment": "Corticosteroids are tried first. Some doctors also\u00a0prescribe a drug called tamoxifen.If corticosteroid treatment doesn't work, a biopsy should be done to confirm the diagnosis. Other medicines to suppress the immune system\u00a0can be\u00a0prescribed.When medicine does not work, surgery and stents (draining tubes) are needed. ", "Causes": "Retroperitoneal fibrosis occurs when extra fibrous tissue forms in the area behind the stomach and intestines. The tissue forms a mass (or masses) that can block the tubes that carry urine from the kidney to the bladder.The cause of this problem is not known. It is most common in people aged 40 - 60. Men are twice as likely to develop the condition as women.", "Prevention": "Try to avoid long-term use of medicines that contain methysergide. This drug has been shown to cause retroperitoneal fibrosis. Methysergide is sometimes used to treat migraine headaches."}, "Restless legs syndrome": {"description": "Restless legs syndrome (RLS) is a nervous system problem that causes you to feel an unstoppable urge to get up and pace or walk. You feel uncomfortable unless you move your legs. Moving stops the unpleasant feeling for a short time.", "Possible Complications": "You may not be able to sleep very well (insomnia).", "Symptoms": ["Creeping and crawling", "Bubbling, pulling, or tugging", "Burning or searing", "Aching, throbbing, or pain", "Itching or gnawing ", "Are worse at night when you lie down", "Sometimes occur during the day", "Start or get worse when you lie down or sit for long periods of time", "May last for 1 hour or longer", "Sometimes also occur in the upper legs, feet, or arms", "Are relieved when you move or stretch as long as you keep moving ", "Daytime sleepiness", "Anxiety or depression", "Confusion", "Difficulty thinking clearly "], "Exams and Tests": "There is no specific test for restless legs syndrome. Your health care provider will take your medical history and do a physical exam. You may have blood tests and other exams to rule out conditions that can cause similar symptoms. Usually, your provider will determine whether you have RLS based on your symptoms.", "Treatment": "Restless legs syndrome can't be cured. However, treatment can help relieve symptoms.Certain lifestyle changes may help you cope with the condition and ease symptoms.Get enough sleep. Go to bed and wake up at the same time every day. Make sure your bed and bedroom are comfortable., Try using hot or cold packs., Help your muscles relax with gentle stretches, massage, and warm baths., Take time out of your day to just to relax. Try yoga, meditation, or other ways to ease tension., Avoid caffeine, alcohol, and tobacco. They may make symptoms worse. . Your health care provider may prescribe medicines to treat RLS.Some medicines help control symptoms:Pramipexole (Mirapex), Ropinirole (Requip), Low doses of narcotics . Other medicines can help you sleep:Sinemet (combination carbidopa-levodopa), an anti-Parkinson's medication, Gabapentin and pregabalin, Clonazepam or other tranquilizers . Medicines to help you sleep may cause daytime sleepiness.Treating conditions with similar symptoms such as peripheral neuropathy or iron deficiency can also help relieve symptoms.", "Causes": "No one knows exactly what causes RLS. It may be due to a problem with the way brain cells use dopamine. Dopamine is a brain chemical that helps with muscle movement.RLS may be linked to some other conditions. It may occur more often in people with:Chronic kidney disease, Diabetes, Iron deficiency, Parkinson's disease, Peripheral neuropathy, Pregnancy, Multiple sclerosis. RLS may also occur in people who: Use certain medicines such as calcium channel blockers, lithium, or neuroleptics, Are stopping sedative use, Use caffeine . RLS occurs most often in middle-aged and older adults. RLS is commonly passed down in families. This may be a factor when symptoms start at a younger age. ", "Prevention": "There is no way to prevent RLS. "}, "Renovascular hypertension": {"description": "Renovascular hypertension is high blood pressure due to narrowing of the arteries that carry blood to the kidneys. This condition is also called renal artery stenosis.", "Possible Complications": "If your blood pressure is not well controlled, you are at risk for the following complications:Aortic aneurysm, Heart attack, Heart failure, Chronic kidney disease, Stroke, Vision problems, Poor blood supply to the legs. ", "Symptoms": ["High blood pressure at a young age", "High blood pressure that suddenly gets worse or is hard to control", "Kidneys that are not working well (this can start suddenly)", "Narrowing of other arteries in the body, such as to the legs, the brain, the eyes and elsewhere", "Sudden buildup of fluid in the air sacs of the lungs (pulmonary edema)", "Bad headache", "Nausea or vomiting", "Confusion", "Changes in vision", "Nosebleeds"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider may hear a \"whooshing\" noise, called a bruit, when placing a stethoscope over your belly area.The following blood tests may be done:Cholesterol level, Renin and aldosterone levels, BUN - blood test, Creatinine - blood test, Potassium - blood test, Creatinine clearance. Imaging tests may be done to see if the kidney arteries have narrowed. They include:Angiotensin converting enzyme (ACE) inhibition renography, Doppler ultrasound of the renal arteries, Magnetic resonance angiography (MRA), Renal artery angiography. ", "Treatment": "High blood pressure caused by narrowing of the arteries that lead to the kidneys is often hard to control.One or more medicines are needed to help control blood pressure. There are many types available.Everyone responds to medicine differently. Your blood pressure should be checked often. The amount and type of medicine you take may need to be changed from time to time., Ask your doctor what blood pressure reading is right for you., Take all medicines the way your doctor prescribed them.. Have your cholesterol levels checked, and treated if\u00a0it is needed. Your doctor will help determine the right cholesterol levels for you based on your heart disease risk and other health conditions. Lifestyle changes are important:Eat a heart-healthy diet., Exercise regularly, at least 30 minutes a day (check with your doctor before starting)., If you smoke, quit. Find a program that will help you stop., Limit how much alcohol you drink: 1 drink a day for women, 2 a day for men., Limit the amount of sodium (salt) you eat. Aim for less than 1,500 mg per day. Check with your doctor about how much potassium you should be eating., Reduce stress. Try to avoid things that cause stress for you. You can also try meditation or yoga., Stay at a healthy body weight. Find a weight-loss program to help you, if you need it.. Further treatment depends on what causes the narrowing of the kidney arteries. Your doctor may recommend a procedure called angioplasty with stenting.These procedures may be an option if you have:Severe narrowing of the renal artery, Blood pressure that cannot be controlled with medicines, Kidneys that are not working well and are becoming worse. However, the decision about which patients should have these procedures is complex, and depends on many of the factors listed above.", "Causes": "Renal artery stenosis is a narrowing or blockage of the arteries that supply blood to the kidneys.The most common cause of renal artery stenosis is a\u00a0blockage in the arteries due to high cholesterol. This problem occurs when a sticky, fatty substance called plaque builds up on the inner lining of the arteries.When the arteries that carry blood to your kidneys become narrow, less blood flows to the kidneys. The kidneys mistakenly respond as if your blood pressure is low. As a result, they release hormones that tell the body to hold on to more salt and water. This causes your blood pressure to rise.Risk factors for atherosclerosis:High blood pressure, Smoking, Diabetes, High cholesterol, Heavy alcohol use, Cocaine abuse, Increasing age . Fibromuscular dysplasia is another cause of renal artery stenosis. It is often seen in women under age 50. It tends to run in families. The condition is caused by abnormal growth of cells in the walls of the arteries leading to the kidneys. This also leads to narrowing or blockage of these arteries.", "Prevention": "Preventing atherosclerosis may prevent rental artery stenosis. Taking the following steps can help: Lose weight if you are overweight., Ask your doctor about your smoking and alcohol use., Control your blood sugar if you have diabetes., Make sure your doctor is monitoring your blood cholesterol levels., Eat a heart healthy diet., Get regular exercise. Check with your doctor before starting an exercise program. . "}, "Ruptured eardrum": {"description": "A ruptured eardrum is an opening or hole in the eardrum. The eardrum is a thin piece of tissue that separates the outer and middle ear. Damage to the eardrum may harm hearing.", "Symptoms": ["Drainage from the ear (drainage may be clear, pus, or bloody)", "Ear noise/buzzing", "Earache or ear discomfort", "Hearing loss in the involved ear (hearing loss may not be total)", "Weakness of the face, or dizziness (in more severe cases) "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will look in your ear with an instrument called an otoscope. If the eardrum is ruptured, the doctor will see an opening in it. The bones of the middle ear may also be visible.Pus draining from the ear may make it harder for the doctor to see the eardrum.Audiology testing can measure how much hearing has been lost.", "Causes": "Ear infections may cause a ruptured eardrum. This occurs more often in children. The infection causes pus or fluid to build up behind the eardrum. As the pressure increases, the eardrum may break open (rupture).Damage to the eardrum can also occur from:A very loud noise close to the ear, such as a gunshot, A rapid change in ear pressure, which may occur when flying, scuba diving, or driving in the mountains, Foreign objects in the ear, Injury to the ear (such as from a powerful slap or explosion), Inserting cotton-tipped swabs or small objects into the ears to clean them . ", "Prevention": "Do not insert objects into the ear canal, even to clean it. Objects stuck in the ear should only be removed by a health care provider. Have ear infections treated promptly.", "Treatment": "You can take steps at home to treat ear pain.Put warm compresses on the ear to help relieve discomfort. , Use medicines such as ibuprofen or acetaminophen to ease pain.. Keep the ear clean and dry while it is healing. Place cotton balls in the ear while showering or shampooing to prevent water from entering the ear., Avoid swimming or putting your head underneath the water. . Your health care provider may prescribe antibiotics (oral or ear drops) to prevent or treat an infection.Sometimes the health care provider may place a patch over the eardrum to speed healing. Surgical repair of the eardrum (tympanoplasty) may be needed if the eardrum does not heal on its own."}, "Retinoblastoma": {"description": "Retinoblastoma is a rare, cancerous tumor of a part of the eye called the retina.", "Possible Complications": "Blindness can occur in the affected eye. The tumor can spread to the eye socket through the optic nerve. It may also spread to the brain, lungs, and bones.", "Symptoms": ["Crossed eyes", "Double vision", "Eyes that do not align", "Eye pain and redness", "Poor vision", "Differing iris colors in each eye "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a complete physical exam, including an eye exam. The following tests may be done:Bone marrow biopsy and cerebrospinal fluid examination in the case of more aggressive tumors, CT scan or MRI of the head, Eye exam with dilation of the pupil, Ultrasound of the eye (head and eye echoencephalogram) . ", "Treatment": "Treatment options depend on the size and location of the tumor:Small tumors may be treated by laser surgery or cryotherapy., Radiation is used for both local tumor and for larger tumors., Chemotherapy may be needed if the tumor has spread beyond the eye., The eye may need to be removed (a procedure called enucleation) if the tumor does not respond to other treatments. In some cases, it may be the first treatment.. ", "Causes": "Retinoblastoma is caused by a mutation in a gene that controls how cells divide. As a result, cells grow out of control and become cancerous.In about half the cases, this mutation develops in a child whose family has never had eye cancer. In other cases, the mutation occurs in several family members. If the mutation runs in the family, there is a 50% chance that an affected person's children will also have the mutation. These children will therefore have a high risk of developing retinoblastoma themselves.The cancer most often affects children younger than 6 years old. It is most commonly diagnosed in children 1 to 2 years old.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling can help families understand the risk of retinoblastoma. It is especially important when more than one family member has had the disease, or if retinoblastoma occurs in both eyes."}, "Rocky Mountain spotted fever": {"description": "Rocky Mountain spotted fever is a disease\u00a0caused by a type of bacteria carried by ticks.", "Possible Complications": "Brain damage, Clotting problems, Heart failure, Kidney failure, Lung failure, Meningitis, Pneumonitis (lung inflammation), Shock. ", "Symptoms": ["Chills", "Confusion", "Fever", "Headache", "Muscle pain", "Rash -- usually starts a few days after the fever; first appears on wrists and ankles as spots that are 1\u00a0to 5 mm in diameter, then spreads to most of the body. About one-third of infected people do not get a rash.", "Diarrhea", "Light sensitivity", "Hallucinations", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea", "Thirst", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done include:Antibody titer by complement fixation or immunofluorescence, Complete blood count (CBC), Kidney function tests, Partial thromboplastin time (PTT), Prothrombin time (PT), Skin biopsy taken from the rash to check for R. rickettsii, Urinalysis to check for blood or protein in the urine. ", "Treatment": "Treatment involves carefully removing the tick from the skin. To get rid of the infection, antibiotics such as\u00a0doxycycline or tetracycline need to be taken. Pregnant women are usually\u00a0prescribed chloramphenicol.", "Causes": "Rocky Mountain spotted fever is caused by the bacteria Rickettsia rickettsii (R. Rickettsii), which is carried by ticks. The bacteria spread to humans through a tick bite.In the western United States, the bacteria are carried by the wood tick, and in the eastern U.S. they are carried by the dog tick. Other ticks spread the infection in the southern U.S. and in Central and South America.Contrary to the name \"Rocky Mountain,\" most recent cases have been reported in the eastern United States, including North and South Carolina, Virginia, Maryland, Georgia, Tennessee, and Oklahoma. Most cases occur in the spring and summer.\u00a0 Most of the cases have been in children.Risk factors include recent hiking or exposure to ticks in an area where the disease is known to occur. The bacteria are unlikely to be transmitted to a person by a tick that has been attached for less than 20 hours. Only about 1 in 1,000 wood and dog ticks carry the bacteria. Bacteria can also infect people who crush ticks they have removed from pets with their bare fingers.", "Prevention": "When walking or hiking in tick-infested areas, tuck long pants into socks to protect the legs. ear shoes and long-sleeved shirts. Ticks will show up on white or light colors better than on dark colors, making them easier to see and remove.Remove ticks immediately by using tweezers, pulling carefully and steadily. Insect repellent may be helpful. Because far fewer than 1% of ticks carry this infection, antibiotics are not usually given after a tick bite."}, "Retropharyngeal abscess": {"description": "Retropharyngeal abscess is a collection of pus in the tissues in the back of the throat. It is a potentially life-threatening medical condition.", "Possible Complications": "Airway obstruction, Aspiration, Mediastinitis, Osteomyelitis. This list may not include all complications.", "Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty", " \r\n Difficulty swallowing \r\n ", "Drooling", "High fever", "High-pitched sound when inhaling (stridor)", "Muscles between the ribs pull in when breathing (intercostal retractions)", "Severe throat pain", "Difficulty turning the head"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and look inside the throat. The doctor or nurse may gently rub the back of the throat with a cotton swab. This is to take a sample of tissue to check it more closely and\u00a0is called a throat culture.Other tests may include:Complete blood count (CBC), CT scan of the neck, X-ray of the neck. ", "Treatment": "Surgery is needed to drain the infected area. Corticosteroids are sometimes given to reduce airway swelling. High-dose antibiotics are given through a vein (intravenous) to treat the infection.The airway will be protected so that it does not become completely blocked by the swelling.", "Causes": "Retropharyngeal abscess generally affects children under age 5, but it can occur at any age.Infected material (pus) builds up in the space around the tissues at the back of the throat. This can occur during or immediately after a throat infection.", "Prevention": "Prompt diagnosis and treatment of pharyngitis or upper respiratory infections can prevent retropharyngeal abscess."}, "Rett syndrome": {"description": "Rett syndrome is a disorder of the nervous system that leads to developmental reversals, especially in the areas of expressive language and hand use.", "Symptoms": ["Breathing problems -- problems tend to get worse with stress; breathing is usually normal during sleep and abnormal while awake", "Change in development", "Excessive saliva and drooling", "Floppy arms and legs -- frequently the first sign", "Intellectual disabilities and learning difficulties (assessing cognitive skills in those with Rett syndrome, however, is difficult because of the speech and hand motion abnormalities)", "Scoliosis", "Shaky, unsteady, or stiff gait; or toe walking", "Seizures", "Slowing head growth beginning at approximately 5 - 6 months of age", "Loss of normal sleep patterns", "Loss of purposeful hand movements; for example, the grasp used to pick up small objects is replaced by repetitive hand motions like hand wringing or constant placement of hands in mouth", "Loss of social engagement", "Ongoing, severe constipation and gastroesophageal reflux (GERD)", "Poor circulation that can lead to cold and bluish arms and legs", "Severe language development problems"], "Exams and Tests": "Genetic testing may be done to look for the gene defect associated with the syndrome. However, since the defect is not identified in everyone with the disease, the diagnosis of Rett syndrome is based on symptoms.There are several different types of Rett syndrome:Atypical, Classical (meets the diagnostic criteria), Provisional (some symptoms appear between ages 1 and 3). Rett syndrome is classified as atypical if:It begins early (soon after birth) or late (beyond 18 months of age, sometimes as late as 3 or 4 years old), Speech and hand skill problems are mild, It is appears in a boy (very rare). ", "Causes": "Rett syndrome occurs almost always in girls. It\u00a0may be misdiagnosed as autism or cerebral palsy.Studies have linked many Rett syndrome cases to a defect in a gene called methl-CpG-binding protein 2 (MeCP2). This gene is on the X chromosome. Females have two X chromosomes. Even when one chromosome has this\u00a0defect, the other X chromosome is normal enough for the child to survive.Males born with this defective gene do not have a second X chromosome to make up for the problem. Therefore, the defect usually results in miscarriage, stillbirth, or very early death.The condition affects about 1 out of 10,000 children. Groups of the disease have appeared within families and certain areas of the world, including Norway, Sweden, and northern Italy.", "Prevention": "The likelihood of having another child with Rett syndrome is less than 1%.", "Treatment": "Treatment may include:Help with feeding and diapering, Methods to treat constipation and GERD, Physical therapy to help prevent hand problems, Weight bearing exercises for those with scoliosis. Supplemental feedings can help those with slowed growth. A feeding tube may be needed if the child breathes in (aspirates) food. Diets high in calories and fat combined with feeding tubes can help increase weight and height. Weight gain may improve alertness and social interactions.Medications such as carbamazepine may be used to treat seizures. Other medications or supplements that have been used or studied include:Bromocriptine, Dextromethorphan, Folate and betaine, L-carnitine, which may help improve language skills, muscle mass, alertness, energy and quality of life while decreasing constipation and daytime sleepiness, L-dopa for motor rigidity in later stages of the disease. Stem cell therapy, alone or in combination with gene therapy, is another hopeful treatment."}, "Respiratory alkalosis": {"description": "See also: Alkalosis", "Possible Complications": "Seizures may occur if the alkalosis is extremely severe. This is very rare.", "Symptoms": ["Dizziness", "Light-headedness", "Numbness of the hands and feet"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or nurse will perform a physical exam. Tests that may be done include:Arterial blood gas, which measures oxygen and carbon dioxide levels in the blood, Basic metabolic panel, Chest x-ray, Pulmonary function test. ", "Treatment": "Treatment is aimed at the condition that causes respiratory alkalosis. Breathing into a paper bag -- or using a mask that causes you to re-breathe carbon dioxide -- sometimes helps reduce symptoms.", "Causes": "Common causes include:Anxiety, Fever, Hyperventilation, Pregnancy (this is normal). Any lung disease that leads to shortness of breath can also cause respiratory alkalosis (such as pulmonary embolism and asthma)."}, "Retinal artery occlusion": {"description": "Retinal artery occlusion is a blockage in one of the small arteries that carry blood to the retina. The retina is a layer of tissue in the back of the eye that is able to sense light. ", "Possible Complications": "Glaucoma (CRAO only), Partial or complete loss of vision in the affected eye, Stroke (due to the same factors that contribute to retinal artery occlusion, not due to the occlusion itself). ", "Symptoms": ["All of one eye (central retinal artery occlusion or CRAO)", "Part of one eye (branch retinal artery occlusion or BRAO)"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests to evaluate the retina may include:Examination of the retina after dilating the pupil, Fluorescein angiography, Intraocular pressure, Pupil reflex response, Refraction, Retinal photography, Slit lamp examination, Testing of side vision (visual field examination), Visual acuity. General tests should include:Blood pressure, Blood tests, including cholesterol and triglyceride levels and the erythrocyte sedimentation rate, Physical examination. Tests to identify the source of a clot from another part of the body:Echocardiogram, Electrocardiogram, Heart monitor for abnormal heart rhythm, Duplex Doppler ultrasound of the carotid arteries. ", "Treatment": "There is no proven treatment for vision loss that involves the whole eye, unless it is caused by another illness that can be treated.Several treatments may be tried. These treatments must be given within 2 - 4 hours after symptoms begin to be helpful. However, the benefit of these treatments has never been proven, and they are rarely used.Breathing in (inhaling) a carbon dioxide-oxygen mixture. This treatment causes the arteries of the retina to widen (dilate)., Massage of the eye, The clot-busting drug, tissue plasminogen activator (tPA). The health care provider should look for the cause of the blockage. Blockages may be signs of a life-threatening medical problem.", "Causes": "Retinal arteries may become blocked when a blood clot or fat deposits get stuck in the arteries. These blockages are more likely if there is hardening of the arteries (atherosclerosis) in the eye.Clots may travel from other parts of the body and block an artery in the retina. The most common sources of clots are the heart and carotid artery in the neck.Most blockages occur in people with conditions such as:Carotid artery disease, in which the two large blood vessels in the neck become narrowed or blocked, Diabetes, Heart rhythm problem (atrial fibrillation), Heart valve problem, High levels of fat in the blood (hyperlipidemia), High blood pressure, Intravenous drug abuse, Temporal arteritis (damage to arteries due to an immune response) . If a branch of the retinal artery is blocked, part of the retina will not receive enough blood and oxygen. If this happens, you may lose part of your vision.", "Prevention": "Measures used to prevent other blood vessel (vascular) diseases, such as coronary artery disease, may decrease the risk of retinal artery occlusion. These include:Eating a low-fat diet, Exercising, Stopping smoking, Losing weight if you are overweight. Sometimes blood thinners may be used to prevent the artery from becoming blocked again. Aspirin or other anti-clotting drugs are used if the problem is in the carotid arteries. Warfarin or other more potent blood thinners are used if the problem is in the heart."}, "Rubella": {"description": "Congenital rubella is when a pregnant woman with rubella passes it to the baby that is still in her womb.", "Possible Complications": "Complications can occur in the unborn baby if the mother becomes infected during pregnancy. A miscarriage or stillbirth may occur. The child may be born with birth defects. ", "Symptoms": ["Bruising (rare)", "Inflammation of the eyes (bloodshot eyes)", "Muscle or joint pain"], "Exams and Tests": "A nasal or throat swab may be sent for culture.A blood test can be done to see if a person is protected against rubella. All women who may become pregnant should have this test. If the test is negative, they will receive the vaccine.", "Treatment": "There is no treatment for this disease.Patients can take acetaminophen to reduce fever. Defects that occur with congenital rubella syndrome can be treated.", "Causes": "Rubella is caused by a virus that is spread through the air or by close contact.A person with rubella may spread the disease to others from 1 week before the rash begins, until 1 to 2 weeks after the rash disappears.Because the measles-mumps-rubella (MMR) vaccine is given to most children, rubella is much less common now. Almost everyone who receives the vaccine has immunity to rubella. Immunity means that your body has built a defense to the rubella virus.In some adults, the vaccine may wear off and not fully protect them. Women who may become pregnant and other adults may receive a booster shot.Children and adults who were never vaccinated against rubella may still get this infection.", "Prevention": "There is a safe and effective vaccine to prevent rubella. The rubella vaccine is recommended for all children. It is routinely given when children are 12 to 15 months old, but is sometimes given earlier during epidemics. A second vaccination (booster) is routinely given to children ages 4 to 6. MMR is a combination vaccine that protects against measles, mumps, and rubella.Women of childbearing age usually have a blood test to see if they have immunity to rubella. If they are not immune, women should avoid getting pregnant for 28 days after receiving the vaccine.Those who should not get vaccinated include:Women who are pregnant, Anyone whose immune system is affected by cancer, corticosteroid medications, or radiation treatment. . Great care is taken not to give the vaccine to a woman who is already pregnant. However, in the rare instances when pregnant women have been vaccinated, no problems have been detected in the infants."}, "Ringworm": {"description": "Ringworm is a skin infection due to a fungus. Often, there are several patches of ringworm on your skin at once.", "Symptoms": ["Itchy, red, raised, scaly patches that may blister and ooze.", "The patches tend to have sharply-defined edges. ", "Red patches are often redder around the outside with normal skin tone in the center. This may look like a ring."], "Exams and Tests": "Most of the time, your health care provider can diagnose ringworm by looking at your skin. The fungus may glow when your skin is examined with a blue light (called a Wood's lamp) in a dark room.Tests to confirm the diagnosis may include:KOH exam, Skin biopsy, Skin culture. ", "Causes": "Ringworm is common, especially among children. However, it may affect people of all ages. It is caused by a fungus, not a worm like the name suggests.Many bacteria and fungi live on your body. Some of these are useful, while others can cause infections. Ringworm occurs when a type of fungus called tinea grows and multiplies on your skin.Ringworm can affect the skin on your:Beard -- tinea barbae, Body -- tinea corporis, Feet -- tinea pedis (also called athlete's foot), Groin area -- tinea cruris (also called jock itch), Scalp -- tinea capitis. Ringworm can spread easily from one person to another. You can catch ringworm if you touch someone who has the infection, or if you come into contact with items contaminated by the fungus, such as combs, unwashed clothing, and shower or pool surfaces. You can also catch ringworm from pets that carry the fungus. Cats are common carriers.The fungus that causes ringworm thrive in warm, moist areas. Ringworm is more likely when you are often wet (such as from sweating) and from minor injuries to your skin, scalp, or nails.", "Prevention": "To prevent ringworm:Keep your skin and feet clean and dry., Shampoo regularly, especially after haircuts., Do not share clothing, towels, hairbrushes, combs, headgear, or other personal care items. Such items should be thoroughly cleaned and dried after use., Wear sandals or shoes at gyms, lockers, and pools., Avoid touching pets with bald spots.. ", "Treatment": "To care for ringworm:Keep your skin clean and dry., Apply over-the-counter antifungal or drying powders, lotions, or creams that contain miconazole, clotrimazole, or similar ingredients., Do not wear clothing that rubs against and irritates the area., Wash sheets and nightclothes every day while you are infected.. Your health care provider may prescribe pills to treat the fungus if you have:A severe case of ringworm, Ringworm that keeps coming back or that lasts for a long time, Ringworm in your hair. You may need medicines such as ketoconazole, which are stronger than over-the-counter products. You may also need antibiotics to treat skin infections from strep or staph that are caused by scratching the area.Infected pets also should be treated."}, "Raynaud's phenomenon": {"description": "Raynaud's phenomenon is a condition in which cold temperatures or strong emotions cause blood vessel spasms. This blocks blood flow to the fingers, toes, ears, and nose.", "Possible Complications": "Gangrene or skin ulcers may occur if an artery becomes completely blocked. This problem is more likely in people who also have arthritis or autoimmune conditions., Fingers may become thin and tapered with smooth shiny skin and nails that grow slowly. This due to the poor blood flow to the areas.. ", "Symptoms": ["First,\u00a0the fingers, toes, ears, or nose to become white, then turn blue. ", "When blood flow returns, the area becomes red and then later returns to normal color. ", "The attacks may last from minutes to hours."], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can often detect the condition by doing a physical exam and asking you questions.Tests that may be done to confirm the diagnosis include:Vascular ultrasound, Cold stimulation test for Raynaud's phenomenon. Blood tests may be done to diagnose arthritic and autoimmune conditions that may cause Raynaud's phenomenon.", "Treatment": "Taking these steps may help control Raynaud's phenomenon:Stop smoking. Smoking causes blood vessels to narrow even more., Avoid caffeine., Avoid taking medicines that cause blood vessels to tighten or spasm., Keep the body warm. Avoid exposure to cold in any form. Wear mittens or gloves outdoors and when handling ice or frozen food. Avoid getting chilled, which may happen after any active recreational sport., Wear comfortable, roomy shoes and wool socks. When outside, always wear shoes.. Your health care provider may prescribe medicines to relax the walls of the blood vessels. These include topical nitroglycerin cream that you rub on your skin, calcium channel blockers, sildenafil (Viagra), and ACE inhibitors.It is vital to treat the condition causing Raynaud's phenomenon.", "Causes": "Raynaud's phenomenon can be linked to other conditions. This is called secondary Raynaud's phenomenon. Most people with the condition are over age 30.Common causes are:Diseases of the arteries (such as atherosclerosis and Buerger's disease), Drugs that cause narrowing of arteries (such as amphetamines, certain types of beta-blockers, some cancer drugs, certain drugs used for migraine headaches), Arthritis and autoimmune conditions (such as scleroderma, Sjogren syndrome, rheumatoid arthritis, and systemic lupus erythematosus) , Repeated injury or usage (such as from typing, playing the piano, or heavy use of hand tools), Smoking, Frostbite, Thoracic outlet syndrome. Raynaud's phenomenon can\u00a0also occur without another cause. This is called primary Raynaud's phenomenon. It most often begins in people younger than age 30."}, "Rabies": {"description": "Rabies is a deadly viral infection that is mainly spread by infected animals.", "Possible Complications": "Untreated, rabies can lead to coma and death.In rare cases, some people may have an allergic reaction to the rabies vaccine.", "Symptoms": ["Drooling", "Convulsions", "Exaggerated sensation at the bite site", "Excitability", "Loss of feeling in an area of the body", "Loss of muscle function", "Low-grade fever (102 degrees F or lower)", "Muscle spasms", "Numbness and tingling", "Pain at the site of the bite", "Restlessness", "Swallowing difficulty (drinking causes spasms of the voicebox) "], "Exams and Tests": "If an animal bites you, try to gather as much information about the animal as possible. Call your local animal control authorities to safely capture the animal. If rabies is suspected, the animal will be watched for signs of rabies.A special test called immunofluorescence is used to look at the brain tissue after an animal is dead. This test can reveal whether the animal had rabies.The doctor or nurse will examine you and look at the bite. The wound will be cleaned and treated as appropriate. The same test used on animals can be done to check for rabies in humans. The test uses a piece of skin from the neck. Doctors may also look for the rabies virus in your saliva or spinal fluid, although these tests are not as sensitive and may need to be repeated.A spinal tap may be done to look for signs of the infection in your spinal fluid.", "Treatment": "Clean the wound well with soap and water, and seek professional medical help. You will need a doctor to thoroughly clean the wound and remove any foreign objects. Most of the time, stitches should not be used for animal bite wounds.If there is any risk of rabies, you will be given a series of a preventive vaccine. The vaccine is generally given in 5 doses over 28 days.Most patients also receive a treatment called human rabies immunoglobulin (HRIG). This treatment\u00a0is given the day the bite occurred.Call your doctor right away after an animal bite or after being exposed to animals such as bats, foxes, and skunks. They may carry rabies.Call even when no bite took place., Immunization and treatment for possible rabies are recommended for at least up to 14 days after exposure or a bite. . There is no known effective treatment for people with symptoms of a rabies infection, but there have been a few reports of people surviving with experimental treatments.", "Causes": "Rabies is spread by infected saliva that enters the body through a bite or broken skin. The virus travels from the wound to the brain, where it causes swelling, or inflammation. This inflammation leads to symptoms of the disease. Most rabies deaths occur in children.In the past, human rabies cases in the United States usually resulted from a dog bite. Recently, more cases of human rabies have been linked to bats and raccoons. Although dog bites are a common cause of rabies in developing countries, there have been no reports of rabies caused by dog bites in the United States for a number of years due to widespread animal vaccination.Other wild animals that can spread the rabies virus include:Foxes, Skunks. Very rarely, rabies has been transmitted without an actual bite. This type of\u00a0infection\u00a0is believed to be caused by infected saliva that has gotten into the air, usually in bat caves.The United Kingdom once completely eradicated rabies, but recently, rabies-infected bats have been found in Scotland.", "Prevention": "To help prevent rabies:Avoid contact with animals you don't know., Get vaccinated if you work in a high-risk occupation or travel to countries with a high rate of rabies., Make sure your pets receive the proper immunizations. Ask your veterinarian., Follow quarantine regulations on importing dogs and other mammals in disease-free countries.. "}, "Renal papillary necrosis": {"description": "Renal papillary necrosis is a disorder of the kidneys in which all or part of the renal papillae die. The renal papillae are the areas where the openings of the collecting ducts enter the kidney, and where the urine flows into the ureters.", "Possible Complications": "Acute kidney failure,  \r\n Acute bilateral obstructive uropathy \r\n , Acute unilateral obstructive uropathy,  \r\n Chronic bilateral obstructive uropathy \r\n , Chronic kidney disease, Chronic or recurrent urinary tract infection (UTI),  \r\n Chronic unilateral obstructive uropathy \r\n , Hyperkalemia, Hypovolemia, Metabolic acidosis. ", "Symptoms": ["Back pain or flank pain", "Bloody urine", "Cloudy urine", "Dark, rust-colored, or brown urine", "Tissue pieces in the urine", "Chills", "Fever", "Painful urination", "Urinary frequency or urgency", "Urinary hesitancy", "Urinary incontinence", "Urinating large amounts", "Urinating often at night"], "Exams and Tests": "The area over the affected kidney (in the flank) may feel tender during an exam. There may be a history of urinary tract infections. There may be signs of obstructive uropathy or kidney failure.A urinalysis may show infection or dead tissue in the urine.An intravenous pyelogram (IVP) may show a blockage or tissue in the renal pelvis or ureter.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for renal papillary necrosis. Treatment depends on the cause. For example, if analgesic nephropathy is the cause, your doctor will recommend that you stop using the medicine that is causing it. This may allow the kidney to heal over time.", "Causes": "Renal papillary necrosis usually occurs with analgesic nephropathy. However, a number of other conditions can cause it, including:Diabetic nephropathy, Kidney infection (pyelonephritis), Kidney transplant rejection, Sickle cell anemia, Urinary tract blockage. Sickle cell anemia is a common cause of renal papillary necrosis in children.", "Prevention": "Controlling diabetes or sickle cell anemia may reduce your risk. To prevent renal papillary necrosis from analgesic nephropathy, be careful when using medications, including over-the-counter pain relievers."}, "Retinitis pigmentosa": {"description": "Retinitis pigmentosa is an eye disease in which there is damage to the retina. The retina is the layer of tissue at the back of the inner eye that converts light images to nerve signals and sends them to the brain.", "Possible Complications": "Peripheral and central loss of vision will occur over time.People with retinitis pigmentosa often develop cataracts at an early age. They may also develop swelling of the retina (macular edema). Cataracts can be removed if they contribute to vision loss.Many other conditions are similar to retinitis pigmentosa, including:Friedreich's ataxia, Laurence-Moon syndrome (also called Laurence-Moon-Bardet-Biedl syndrome), Mucopolysaccharidosis, Myotonic dystrophy, Usher syndrome (a combination of retinitis pigmentosa and hearing loss) . ", "Symptoms": ["Decreased vision at night or in low light", "Loss of side (peripheral) vision, causing \"tunnel vision\"", "Loss of central vision (in advanced cases) "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests to evaluate the retina:Color vision, Exam of the retina by ophthalmoscopy after the pupils have been dilated, Fluorescein angiography, Intraocular pressure, Measurement of the electrical activity in the retina (electroretinogram), Pupil reflex response, Refraction test, Retinal photography, Side vision test (visual field test), Slit lamp examination, Visual acuity. ", "Treatment": "There is no effective treatment for this condition. Wearing sunglasses to protect the retina from ultraviolet light may help preserve vision.Some studies suggest that treatment with antioxidants (such as high doses of vitamin A palmitate) may slow the disease. However, taking high doses of vitamin A can cause serious liver problems. The benefit of treatment has to be weighed against risks to the liver.Clinical trials are in progress to assess new treatments for retinitis pigmentosa, including the use of DHA, which is an omega-3 fatty acid.Other treatments, such as microchip implants into the retina that act like a microscopic video camera, are in the early stages of development. These treatments may\u00a0be\u00a0useful for\u00a0treating blindness associated with RP and other serious eye conditions.A vision specialist can help you adapt to vision loss. Make regular visits to an eye care specialist, who can detect cataracts or retinal swelling. Both of these problems can be treated.", "Causes": "Retinitis pigmentosa can run in families. The disorder can be caused by several genetic defects.The cells controlling night vision (rods) are most likely to be affected. However, in some cases, retinal cone cells are damaged the most. The main sign of the disease is the presence of dark deposits in the retina.The main risk factor is a family history of retinitis pigmentosa. It is a rare condition affecting about 1 in 4,000 people in the United States.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling and testing may help determine whether your children are at risk for this disease."}, "Reifenstein syndrome": {"description": "This disorder\u00a0is a type of\u00a0androgen insufficiency syndrome. ", "Possible Complications": "These problems may occur:Breast development in men, Infertility and failure to develop normal male genitals, Psychological problems, such as depression . ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal male genitals, such as the urethra being on the underside of the penis, small penis, small scrotum (with a line down the middle or incompletely closed), or undescended testicles.", "Breast development in males at time of puberty", "Decreased body hair and beard, but normal pubic and armpit hair", "Sexual dysfunction in males and infertility"], "Exams and Tests": "The\u00a0health care provider\u00a0will perform a physical exam. The male may have:Partially developed female sex organs, Small or absent vas deferens (the tubes through which sperm exit the testes). Tests may include:Blood tests, Genetic tests, Sperm count, Testicular biopsy. ", "Treatment": "Treatment with testosterone may improve the chance that a boy will be able to have children when he grows up.", "Causes": "As a male baby grows in the womb, male hormones are made. This leads to the development of male sex organs.In Reifenstein syndrome, there is a change in the gene that helps the body recognize and use male hormones properly. This leads to problems with the development of the male sex organs. At birth, the baby may have ambiguous genitals, which leads to confusion over the baby's sex.The syndrome is passed down through families (inherited). Women are not affected but may carry the gene. Males who inherit the gene from their mothers will have the condition. There is a 50% chance that a male child of a mother with the gene will be affected. Every female child has a 50% chance of carrying the gene. Family history is important in determining risk factors.The syndrome is estimated to affect 1 in 99,000 people.", "Prevention": "Prenatal testing is available. People with a family history of this condition should consider genetic counseling. Testosterone treatment that is started early may prevent some infertility."}, "Reactive attachment disorder of infancy or early childhood": {"description": "Reactive attachment disorder is a problem with social interaction that occurs when a child's basic physical and emotional needs are neglected, particularly when the child is an infant.", "Possible Complications": "If not treated, this condition can permanently affect the child's social interactions. It can be connected with:Anxiety, Depression, Other psychological problems, Post-traumatic stress disorder. ", "Symptoms": ["Avoiding caregiver", "Avoiding physical contact", "Difficulty being\u00a0comforted", "Not making distinctions when socializing with strangers", "Resisting social interaction", "Wanting to be alone ", "Basic emotional needs for comfort, stimulation, and affection", "Basic physical needs like food, toileting, and play "], "Exams and Tests": "This disorder is diagnosed with a:Complete history, Physical examination, Psychiatric evaluation. ", "Treatment": "Treatment has two parts. The first\u00a0goal is to make sure the child is in a safe environment where emotional and physical needs are met.Once that has been established, the next step is to change the relationship between the caregiver and the child, if the caregiver has caused the problem. Classes on parenting skills can help. These skills give the caregiver the ability to meet the child's needs and bond with the child.The caregiver should also have counseling to work on any current problems, such as drug abuse or family violence. Social Services should follow the family to make sure the child remains in a safe, stable environment.Parents who adopt babies or young children from foreign orphanages should be aware that this condition may occur and be sensitive to the child's need for consistency, physical affection, and love.These children may be frightened of people and find physical affection overwhelming at first, and parents should not view this as rejection. It is a normal response in someone who has been abused to avoid contact. Hugs should be offered frequently, but not forced.A mental health evaluation should be completed. This evaluation will be helpful in developing a treatment plan.", "Causes": "Reactive attachment disorder is caused by abuse or neglect of an infant's needs for:Emotional bonds with a primary or secondary caretaker, Food, Physical safety, Touching. An infant or child may be neglected when the:Caregiver is intellectually disabled, Caregiver lacks parenting skills, Parents are isolated, Parents are teenagers. A frequent change in caregivers (for example, in orphanages or foster care) is another cause of reactive attachment disorder.Children who are adopted from foreign orphanages are commonly affected, particularly if they were removed from their birth parents during the first weeks of life.", "Prevention": "Early recognition is very important for the child. Parents who are at high risk for neglect should be taught parenting skills. The family should be followed by either a social worker or doctor to make sure the child's needs are being met."}, "Rubber cement poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty (from inhalation)", "Throat swelling (which may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Burning in the nose, lips, throat, or eyes", "Vision loss", "Change in the acid balance of the blood, which can lead to organ damage", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure", "Abdominal pain", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "Convulsions", "Dizziness", "Headache", "Muscle spasms", "Nerve problems", "Unconsciousness", "Unstable walk", "Irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Retinal detachment": {"description": "Retinal detachment is a separation of the light-sensitive membrane (retina) in the back of the eye from its supporting layers.", "Possible Complications": "A retinal detachment causes loss of vision. Surgery to repair it may help restore some or all of your vision.", "Symptoms": ["Bright flashes of light, especially in peripheral vision", "Blurred vision", "Floaters in the eye", "Shadow or blindness in a part of the visual field of one eye"], "Exams and Tests": "The ophthalmologist (eye doctor) will examine your eyes. Tests will be done to check the retina and pupil:Using special dye and camera to look at blood flow in the retina (fluorescein angiography), Checking pressure inside the eye (tonometry)\u00a0, Examining the back part of the eye, including the retina (ophthalmoscopy), Checking eyeglass prescription (refraction test), Checking color vision, Checking the smallerst letters that can be read (visual acuity), Checking structures at the front of the eye (slit-lamp examination)\u00a0, Ultrasound of the eye. ", "Treatment": "Most people with a retinal detachment need surgery. Surgery may be done\u00a0right away\u00a0or after a short time.Surgery may not be needed if you do not have symptoms or have had the detachment for a while.Some types of surgery can be done in your doctor's office.Lasers may be used to seal tears or holes in the retina before a retinal detachment occurs., If you have a small detachment, the doctor may place a gas bubble in the eye. This is called pneumatic retinopexy. It helps the retina float back into place. The hole is sealed with a laser.. Severe detachments require surgery in a hospital.\u00a0These procedures include:Scleral buckle to gently push the eye wall up against the retina, Vitrectomy to remove gel or scar tissue pulling on the retina, used for the largest tears and detachments.. Tractional retinal detachments may be watched for a while before surgery. If surgery is needed, a vitrectomy is usually done.", "Causes": "The retina is the clear tissue in the back of the eye. It helps you see the images that are focused on it by the cornea and the lens.The most common type of retinal detachments are often due to a tear or hole in the retina. Eye fluid may leak through this opening. This causes the retina to separate from the underlying tissues, much like a bubble under wallpaper. This is most often caused by a condition called posterior vitreous detachment.\u00a0It can\u00a0also be caused by trauma and very bad nearsightedness. A family history of retinal detachment also increases your risk., Another type of retinal detachment is called tractional detachment. This\u00a0type occurs\u00a0in people who have uncontrolled diabetes, had retinal surgery before, or have chronic inflammation. . When the retina becomes detached, bleeding from\u00a0nearby blood vessels\u00a0can cloud the inside of the eye so that you may not see clearly or at all. Central vision becomes severely affected if the macula\u00a0becomes detached. The macula is\u00a0the part of the retina responsible for sharp, detailed vision.", "Prevention": "Use protective eye wear to prevent eye trauma. Control your blood sugar carefully if you have diabetes. See your eye care specialist once a year. You may need more frequent visits if you have risk factors for retinal detachment. Be alert to symptoms of new flashes of light and/or floaters."}, "Reye syndrome": {"description": "This syndrome has occurred in children who were given aspirin when they had chickenpox or the flu. Reye syndrome has become very rare because aspirin is no longer recommended for routine use in children.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Coma, Permanent brain damage, Seizures. When untreated, seizures and coma may be life threatening.", "Symptoms": ["Confusion", "Lethargy", "Loss of consciousness or coma", "Mental changes", "Nausea and vomiting", "Seizures", "Unusual placement of arms and legs (decerebrate posture). The arms are extended straight and turned toward the body, the legs are held straight, and the toes are pointed downward ", "Double vision", "Hearing loss", "Muscle function loss or paralysis of the arms or legs", "Speech difficulties", "Weakness in the arms or legs "], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests may be used to diagnose Reye syndrome:Blood chemistry tests, Head CT or head MRI scan, Liver biopsy, Liver function tests, Serum ammonia test, Spinal tap. ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for this condition. The health care provider will monitor the pressure in the brain, blood gases, and blood acid-base balance (pH).Treatments may include:Breathing support (a breathing machine may be needed during a deep coma), Fluids by IV to provide electrolytes and glucose, Steroids to reduce swelling in the brain . ", "Causes": "Reye syndrome is most often seen in children ages 4 to 12. Most cases that occur with chickenpox are in children ages 5 to 9. Cases that occur with the flu are usually in children ages 10 to 14. ", "Prevention": "Never give a child aspirin unless told to do so by your doctor.When a child must take aspirin, take care to reduce the child's risk of catching a viral illness, such as the flu and chickenpox. Avoid aspirin for several weeks after the child has received a varicella (chickenpox) vaccine.Note: Other over-the-counter medicines, such as Pepto-Bismol and substances with oil of wintergreen also contain aspirin compounds called salicylates. DO NOT give these to a child who has a cold or fever."}, "Respiratory syncytial virus (RSV)": {"description": "Respiratory syncytial virus (RSV) is a very common virus that leads to mild, cold-like symptoms in adults and older healthy children. It can be more serious in young babies, especially those in certain high-risk groups.", "Possible Complications": "In young children, RSV can cause:Bronchiolitis, Lung failure, Pneumonia. ", "Symptoms": ["Symptoms vary and differ with age. They usually appear 4\u00a0to 6 days after coming in contact with the virus.", "Older children usually have only mild, cold-like symptoms, such as croupy cough (often described as a \"seal bark\" cough), stuffy nose, or low-grade fever.", "Bluish skin color due to a lack of oxygen (cyanosis) in more severe cases", "Breathing difficulty or labored breathing", "Nasal flaring", "Rapid breathing (tachypnea)", "Shortness of breath", "Wheezing"], "Exams and Tests": "Many hospitals and clinics can rapidly test for RSV using a sample of fluid taken from the nose with a cotton swab.", "Treatment": "Antibiotics do not treat RSV.Mild infections go away without treatment.Infants and children with a severe RSV infection may be admitted to the hospital . Treatment will include:Oxygen, Moist (humidified) air, Fluids through a vein (by IV). A breathing machine (ventilator) may be needed.", "Causes": "RSV is the most common germ that causes lung and airway infections in infants and young children. Most infants have had this infection by age 2. Outbreaks of RSV infections most often begin in the fall and run into the spring.The infection can occur in people of all ages. The virus spreads through tiny droplets that go into the air when a sick person blows their nose, coughs, or sneezes.You can catch RSV if:A person with RSV sneezes, coughs, or blows their nose near you., You touch, kiss, or shake hands with someone who is infected by the virus., You touch your nose, eyes, or mouth after you have touched something contaminated by the virus, such as a toy or doorknob. . RSV often spreads quickly in crowded households and day care centers. The virus can live for a half an hour or more on hands. The virus can also live for up to 5 hours on countertops and for several hours on used tissues.The following increase the risk for RSV:\r\n  Attending day care\r\n  , \r\n  Being near tobacco smoke\r\n  , \r\n  \r\n  Having school-aged brothers or sisters\r\n  \r\n  , \r\n  Living in crowded conditions\r\n  . ", "Prevention": "To help prevent RSV infection, wash your hands often, especially before touching your baby. Make certain that other people, especially caregivers, take steps to avoid giving RSV to your baby.The following simple steps can help protect your baby from getting sick:Insist that others wash their hands with warm water and soap before touching your baby., Have others avoid contact with the baby if they have a cold or fever. If necessary, have them wear a mask., Be aware that kissing the baby can spread RSV infection., Try to keep young children away from your baby. RSV is very common among young children and easily spreads from child to child., Do not smoke inside your house, car, or anywhere near your baby. Exposure to tobacco smoke increases the risk of RSV illness. . Parents of high-risk young infants should avoid crowds during outbreaks of RSV. Moderate-to-large outbreaks are often reported by\u00a0local news sources to provide parents with an opportunity to avoid exposure.The drug Synagis (palivizumab) is approved for the prevention of RSV disease in children younger than 24 months who are at high risk for serious RSV disease. Ask your doctor if your child should receive this medicine."}, "Retinal vein occlusion": {"description": "Retinal vein occlusion is a blockage of the small veins that carry blood away from the retina. The retina is the layer of tissue at the back of the inner eye that converts light images to nerve signals and sends them to the brain. ", "Possible Complications": "Glaucoma, Partial or complete vision loss in the affected eye. ", "Symptoms": ["Sudden blurring or vision loss in all or part of one eye"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests to evaluate for vein occlusion include:Exam of the retina after dilating the pupil, Fluorescein angiography, Intraocular pressure, Pupil reflex response, Refraction, Retinal photography, Slit lamp examination, Testing of side vision (visual field examination), Visual acuity. Other tests may include:Blood tests for diabetes, high cholesterol, and triglyceride levels, Blood tests to look for a clotting or blood thickening (hyperviscosity) problem (in patients under age 40) . The health care provider will closely monitor any blockage for several months. It may take 3 or more months for harmful effects such as glaucoma to develop after the occlusion.", "Treatment": "Many people will regain vision, even without treatment. However, vision rarely returns to normal. There is no way to reverse or open the blockage.You may need treatment to prevent another blockage from forming in the same or the other eye.It's important to manage diabetes, high blood pressure, and high cholesterol levels. Some people may need to take aspirin or other blood thinners.Treatment for the complications of retinal vein occlusion may include:Focal laser treatment, if macular edema is present, Injections of anti-vascular endothelial growth factor (anti-VEGF) drugs into the eye. These drugs may block the growth of new blood vessels that can cause glaucoma. This treatment is still being studied., Laser treatment to prevent the growth of new, abnormal blood vessels that leads to glaucoma . ", "Causes": "Retinal vein occlusion is most often caused by hardening of the arteries (atherosclerosis) and the formation of a blood clot.Blockage of smaller veins (branch veins or BRVO) in the retina often occurs in places where retinal arteries that have been thickened or hardened by atherosclerosis cross over and place pressure on a retinal vein.Risk factors for retinal vein occlusion include:Atherosclerosis, Diabetes, High blood pressure (hypertension), Other eye conditions, such as glaucoma, macular edema, or vitreous hemorrhage . The risk of these disorders increases with age, therefore retinal vein occlusion most often affects older people.Blockage of retinal veins may cause other eye problems, including:Glaucoma (high pressure in the eye), caused by new, abnormal blood vessels growing in the front part of the eye, Macular edema, caused by the leakage of fluid in the retina . ", "Prevention": "Retinal vein occlusion is a sign of a general blood vessel (vascular) disease. Measures used to prevent other blood vessel diseases may decrease the risk of retinal vein occlusion.These measures include:Eating a low-fat diet, Getting regular exercise, Maintaining an ideal weight, Not smoking . Aspirin or other blood thinners may help prevent blockages in the other eye.Controlling diabetes may help prevent retinal vein occlusion."}, "Rhinophyma": {"description": "Rhinophyma is a large,\u00a0red-colored (ruddy) nose. The nose has a bulb shape.", "Possible Complications": "The change in appearance from rhinophyma can cause emotional distress.", "Symptoms": ["Bulb-like (bulbous) shape", "Many oil glands", "Reddish color (possible)", "Thickening of the skin", "Waxy, yellow surface "], "Exams and Tests": "Most of the time, a health care provider can diagnose rhinophyma without any tests. Sometimes a skin biopsy may be needed.", "Treatment": "The most common treatment is surgery to reshape the nose. Surgery may be done with a laser, scalpel, or rotating brush (dermabrasion). Certain acne medicines may also be helpful in treating the condition.", "Causes": "Rhinophyma was once thought to be caused by heavy alcohol use. This is not correct. Rhinophyma occurs equally in people who do not use alcohol and in those who drink heavily. The problem is much more common in men than in women.The cause of rhinophyma is unknown. It may be a severe form of a skin disease called rosacea. It is an uncommon disorder."}, "Radial nerve dysfunction": {"description": "Radial nerve dysfunction is a problem with the radial nerve. Damage to the radial nerve leads to problems with movement in the arm and wrist and with sensation in the back of the arm or hand.", "Possible Complications": "Mild to severe deformity of the hand, Partial or complete loss of feeling in the hand, Partial or complete loss of wrist or hand movement, Recurrent or unnoticed injury to the hand. ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal sensations to the hand or forearm (\"back\" of the hand), \"thumb side\" (radial surface) of the hand, or fingers nearest to the thumb (2nd and 3rd fingers) ", "Difficulty straightening the arm at the elbow", "Difficulty bending the hand back at the wrist, or holding the hand ", "Numbness, decreased sensation, tingling, or burning sensation ", "Pain "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you and ask questions about your symptoms and medical history. You will be asked what you were doing before the\u00a0symptoms started.An exam of the arm, hand, and wrist may find:Difficulty straightening the arm at the elbow, Trouble turning your\u00a0arm outward , Difficulty lifting the wrist or fingers, Muscle loss (atrophy) in the forearm, Weakness of the wrist and finger, Wrist or finger drop. Tests may be needed. Tests for nerve dysfunction may include:Blood tests, EMG, MRI of the neck or shoulder to look for other causes, Nerve biopsy (rarely needed), Nerve conduction tests, Ultrasound of the elbow . ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to allow you to use the hand and arm as much as possible. Your doctor or nurse should find and treat the cause, if possible. In some cases, no treatment is needed and you will recover slowly on your own.Surgery to repair the nerve or remove\u00a0something that is pressing on the nerve may help.\u00a0Medical causes such as diabetes and kidney disease should be treated.CONTROL OF SYMPTOMSMedications may include:Over-the-counter analgesics or prescription pain medications to control pain (neuralgia), Anticonvulsant medicines (phenytoin, carbamazepine, gabapentin, and pregabalin) or tricyclic antidepressants (amitriptyline) to reduce stabbing pain, Steroid (prednisone) injections around the nerve to reduce swelling may help some patients.. Other treatments include:Braces, splints, or other devices to help you use the hand in severe cases, Physical therapy to help maintain muscle strength. Occupational therapy and vocational therapy or counseling to suggest changes at the worksite may be needed.", "Causes": "Radial neuropathy occurs when there is damage to the radial nerve, which travels down the arm and controls movement of the triceps muscle at the back of the upper arm. It also controls the ability to bend the wrist and fingers backward, and helps with the movement and sensation of the wrist and hand.Mononeuropathy means a single nerve is damaged. With mononeuropathy, usually the nerve damage is caused locally. However, body-wide disorders may damage just one nerve.Causes are:Broken arm bone and other injury, Improper use of crutches, Lead poisoning, Long-term or repeated constriction of the wrist (for example, from wearing a tight watch strap), Long-term pressure on the nerve, usually caused by swelling or injury of nearby body structures, Pinching of the nerve during deep sleep, such as when a person is intoxicated, Pressure caused by hanging the arm over the back of a chair (for example, falling asleep in that position), Pressure to the upper arm from arm positions during sleep or coma . In some cases, no cause can be found.If other nerves are also affected, the health care provider should look for a medical problem that can affect nerves. Medical conditions such as diabetes and kidney disease can damage nerves.", "Prevention": "Avoid prolonged pressure on the upper arm."}, "Rheumatoid arthritis": {"description": "Rheumatoid arthritis (RA) is a long-term disease that leads to inflammation of the joints and surrounding tissues. It can also affect other organs.", "Possible Complications": "Rheumatoid arthritis can affect nearly every part of the body. Complications may include:Damage to the lung tissue (rheumatoid lung), Increased risk of hardening of the arteries, Spinal injury when the neck bones become damaged, Inflammation of the blood vessels (rheumatoid vasculitis), which can lead to skin, nerve, heart, and brain problems, Swelling and inflammation of the outer lining of the heart (pericarditis) and of the heart muscle (myocarditis), which can lead to congestive heart failure. The treatments for RA can also cause serious side effects. Talk to your doctor about the possible side effects of treatment and what to do if they occur.", "Symptoms": ["Morning stiffness, which lasts more than 1 hour, is common. Joints may feel warm, tender, and stiff when not used for an hour.", "Joint pain is often felt on the same joint on both sides of the body.", "Over time, joints may lose their range of motion and may become deformed. ", "Chest pain when taking a breath (pleurisy)", "Dry eyes and mouth (Sjogren syndrome)", "Eye burning, itching, and discharge", "Nodules under the skin (usually a sign of more severe disease)", "Numbness, tingling, or burning in the hands and feet", "Sleep difficulties "], "Exams and Tests": "There is no test that can determine for sure whether you have RA. Most people with RA will have some abnormal test results. However, some people will have normal results for all tests.Two lab tests that often help in the diagnosis are:Rheumatoid factor, Anti-CCP antibody . Other tests that may be done include:Complete blood count, C-reactive protein, Erythrocyte sedimentation rate, Joint ultrasound or MRI, Joint x-rays, Synovial fluid analysis. ", "Treatment": "RA usually requires lifelong treatment, including medications, physical therapy, exercise, education, and possibly surgery. Early, aggressive treatment for RA can delay joint destruction.MEDICINESDisease modifying antirheumatic drugs (DMARDs): These are often the drugs that are tried first in people with RA. They are prescribed along with rest, strengthening exercise, and anti-inflammatory drugs.Methotrexate (Rheumatrex) is the most commonly used DMARD for rheumatoid arthritis. Leflunomide (Arava) and hydroxychloroquine may also be used., Sulfasalazine is an anti-inflammatory drug that is often combined with methotrexate and hydroxychloroquine (triple therapy)., These drugs may have serious side effects, so you will need frequent blood tests when taking them. . Anti-inflammatory medications: These include aspirin and nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs), such as ibuprofen and naproxen.Although NSAIDs work well, long-term use can cause stomach problems, including ulcers and bleeding, and possible heart problems., Celecoxib (Celebrex) is another anti-inflammatory drug. Drugs in this class (COX-2 inhibitors) may increase heart attack and stroke risk for some people. Talk to your doctor about whether these medicines are right for you. . Antimalarial medications: This group of medicines includes hydroxychloroquine (Plaquenil). They are most often used along with methotrexate. It may be weeks or months before you see any benefit from these drugs.Corticosteroids: These medicines work very well to reduce joint swelling and inflammation, but they can have long-term side effects. Therefore should be taken only for a short time and in low doses when possible.Biologic agents: These drugs are designed to affect parts of the immune system that play a role in the disease process of rheumatoid arthritis.They may be given when other medicines for rheumatoid arthritis have not worked. At times, your doctor will start biologic drugs sooner, along with other rheumatoid arthritis drugs.Most of them are given either under the skin (subcutaneously) or into a vein (intravenously). There are different types of biologic agents:White blood cell modulators include: abatacept (Orencia) and rituximab (Rituxan), Tumor necrosis factor (TNF) inhibitors include: adalimumab (Humira), etanercept (Enbrel), infliximab (Remicade), golimumab (Simponi), and certolizumab (Cimzia), Interleukin-6 (IL-6) inhibitors: tocilizumab (Actemra) . Biologic agents can be very helpful in treating rheumatoid arthritis. However, people taking these drugs must be watched very closely because of serious risk factors:Infections from bacteria, viruses, and fungi, Leukemia or lymphoma, Psoriasis, Allergic reactions . Other drugs:Janus kinase inhibitor: Tofacitinib (Xeljanz). This is a medication taken by mouth that is now approved for treating RA. . SURGERYSurgery may be needed to correct severely damaged joints. Surgery may include:Removal of the joint lining (synovectomy), Total joint replacement in extreme cases; may include total knee, hip replacement, ankle replacement, shoulder replacement, and others . PHYSICAL THERAPYRange-of-motion exercises and exercise programs prescribed by a physical therapist can delay the loss of joint function and help keep muscles strong.Sometimes, therapists will use special machines to apply deep heat or electrical stimulation to reduce pain and improve joint movement.Other therapies that may help ease joint pain include:Joint protection techniques , Heat and cold treatments, Splints or orthotic devices to support and align joints , Frequent rest periods between activities, as well as 8 to 10 hours of sleep per night. NUTRITIONSome people with RA may have intolerance or allergies to certain foods. A balanced nutritious diet is recommended. It may be helpful to eat foods rich in fish oils (omega-3 fatty acids).", "Causes": "The cause of RA is unknown. It is an autoimmune disease, which means the body's immune system mistakenly attacks healthy tissue.RA can occur at any age, but is more common in middle age. Women get RA more often than men.Infection, genes, and hormone changes may be linked to the disease.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention. Smoking cigarettes appears to worsen RA, so it is important to avoid tobacco. Proper early treatment can help prevent further joint damage."}, "Rosacea": {"description": "Rosacea is a chronic skin condition that makes your face turn red. It may also cause swelling and skin sores that look like acne.", "Possible Complications": "Lasting changes in appearance (for example, a red, swollen nose), Lower self-esteem . ", "Symptoms": ["Redness of the face", "Blushing or flushing easily", "A lot of spider-like blood vessels (telangiectasia) of the face", "Red nose (called a bulbous nose)", "Acne-like skin sores that may ooze or crust", "Burning or stinging feeling in the face", "Irritated, bloodshot, watery eyes"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can often diagnose rosacea by doing a physical exam and asking questions about your medical history.", "Treatment": "There is no known cure for rosacea.Your health care provider will help you identify the things that make your symptoms worse. These are called triggers. Triggers vary from person to person. Avoiding your triggers may help you prevent or reduce flare-ups.Some things you can do to help ease or prevent symptoms include:Avoid sun exposure. Use sunscreen every day., Avoid a lot of activity in hot weather., Try to reduce stress. Try deep breathing, yoga, or other relaxation techniques., Limit spicy foods, alcohol, and hot beverages.. Other triggers may include wind, hot baths, cold weather, specific skin products, exercise, or other factors.Antibiotics taken by mouth (such as tetracycline, minocycline, or doxycycline) or applied to the skin (such as metronidazole) may control acne-like skin problems., Other medicines (isoretinol or Accutane), which are similar to vitamin A, are stronger drugs that your health care provider might consider., Rosacea is not acne and will not improve with over-the-counter acne treatment.. In very bad cases, laser surgery may help reduce the redness. Surgery to remove some swollen nose tissue may also improve your appearance.", "Causes": "The cause is not known. You may be more likely to have this if you are Age 30-50, Fair-skinned, A woman (men will often have more severe symptoms). Rosacea involves swelling of the blood vessels just under the skin. It may be associated with other skin disorders (acne vulgaris, seborrhea) or eye disorders (blepharitis, keratitis)."}, "Rheumatic fever": {"description": "Rheumatic fever is an inflammatory disease that may develop after an infection with group A\u00a0Streptococcus bacteria (such as strep throat or scarlet fever). The disease can affect the heart, joints, skin, and brain.", "Possible Complications": "Damage to heart valves (such as mitral stenosis and aortic stenosis), Heart failure, Infection of the inner lining of your heart (endocarditis), Inflammation of the membrane around the heart (pericarditis), Irregular heart rhythms (arrhythmias), Sydenham chorea . ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Fever", "Heart problems, which may not have symptoms, or may lead to shortness of breath and chest pain", "Joint pain, arthritis (mainly in the knees, elbows, ankles, and wrists)", "Joint swelling, redness, or warmth", "Nosebleeds", "Ring-shaped or snake-like skin rash on the trunk and upper part of the arms or legs", "Skin lumps (nodules) ", "Sydenham chorea (emotional instability, muscle weakness and quick, uncoordinated jerky movements that mainly affect the face, feet, and hands) "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will examine you and will carefully check your heart sounds, skin, and joints.Tests may include:Blood test for repeated strep infection (such as an ASO test), Complete blood count (CBC), Electrocardiogram (EKG), Sedimentation rate (ESR -- a test that measures inflammation in the body) . Several factors called major and minor criteria have been developed to help diagnose rheumatic fever in a standard way. The major criteria for diagnosis include:Arthritis in several large joints, Heart inflammation, Nodules under the skin, Rapid, jerky movements (chorea, Sydenham chorea), Skin rash . The minor criteria include:Fever, High ESR, Joint pain, Abnormal EKG . You'll likely be diagnosed with rheumatic fever if you meet two major criteria, or one major and two minor criteria, and have signs of a past strep infection.", "Treatment": "If you are diagnosed with acute rheumatic fever you will be treated with antibiotics.Anti-inflammatory medications such as aspirin or corticosteroids reduce inflammation to help manage acute rheumatic fever.You may have to take low doses of antibiotics (such as penicillin, sulfadiazine, or erythromycin) over the long term to prevent strep throat from returning.", "Causes": "Rheumatic fever is common in developing countries worldwide. It does not often occur in the United States and other developed countries. When rheumatic fever does occur in the U.S., it is usually in isolated outbreaks. The latest outbreak in the U.S. was in the 1980s.Rheumatic fever mainly affects children ages 5 -15 who have had strep throat or scarlet fever. If it occurs, it develops about 14 - 28 days after these illnesses.", "Prevention": "The most important way to prevent rheumatic fever is by getting quick treatment for strep throat and scarlet fever."}, "Reactive arthritis": {"description": "Reactive arthritis is a group of conditions that may involve the joints, urethra, and eyes. These areas become swollen and inflamed. It is often in response to infections.", "Symptoms": ["Burning when urinating", "Fluid leaking from the urethra (discharge)", "Problems starting or continuing a urine stream", "Needing to urinate more often than normal ", "Heel pain or pain in the Achilles tendon", "Pain in the hip, knee, ankle, and low back", "Pain that only one side of the body or more than one joint "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will diagnose the condition based on your symptoms. A physical exam may show signs of conjunctivitis or skin sores. Symptoms may not all appear at the same time so there may be a delay in getting a diagnosis.You may have the following tests:HLA-B27 antigen, Joint x-rays, Sed rate (ESR), Urinalysis. ", "Causes": "The exact cause of reactive arthritis is unknown. It occurs most often in men younger than age 40. It may follow an infection in the urethra after unprotected sex. It can also follow an intestinal infection (such as food poisoning).Certain genes may make you more likely to get this condition.The disorder is rare in young children, but it may occur in teenagers.", "Prevention": "Avoid infections that can bring on reactive arthritis by practicing safe sex and avoiding things that can cause food poisoning.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to relieve symptoms and treat the infection that is causing this condition.Eye problems and skin sores do not need to be treated most of the time. They will go away on their own.Your doctor will prescribe antibiotics if you have an infection. Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDS) and pain relievers may help with joint pain. If a joint is very swollen for a long period of time, your health care provider may inject a corticosteroid medicine into the joint.Physical therapy can help you relieve pain. It can also help you move better and maintain muscle strength. Rarely, people with a severe case of the disease may need medication to suppress the immune system."}, "Ramsay Hunt syndrome": {"description": "Ramsay Hunt syndrome is a painful rash around the ear that occurs when the varicella zoster virus infects a nerve in the head.", "Possible Complications": "Changes to the appearance of the face (disfigurement) from loss of movement, Changes to taste, Damage to the eye (corneal ulcers and infections), resulting in a loss of vision, Nerves that grow back to the wrong structures and cause abnormal reactions to a movement -- for example, smiling causes the eye to close, Persistent pain (postherpetic neuralgia), Spasm of the face muscles or eyelids . Occasionally, the virus may spread to other nerves, or even to the brain and spinal cord. This can cause:Confusion, Drowsiness , Headaches, Limb weakness, Nerve pain. If these symptoms occur, a hospital stay may be needed. A spinal tap may help determine whether other areas of the nervous system have been infected.", "Symptoms": ["Painful rash on the eardrum, ear canal, earlobe, tongue, and roof of the mouth on the side where there is\u00a0weakness of the face", "Hearing loss on one side", "Sensation of things spinning (vertigo)", "Weakness on one side of the face that causes difficulty closing one eye, eating (food falls out of the weak corner of the mouth), making expressions, and making fine movements of the face, as well as facial droop and paralysis on one side of the face "], "Exams and Tests": "A doctor will usually diagnose Ramsay Hunt Syndrome by looking for signs of weakness in the face and a blister-like rash.Tests may include:Blood tests for varicella zoster virus, Electromyography (EMG), Lumbar puncture, MRI of the head, Nerve conduction (to determine the amount of damage to the facial nerve), Skin tests for varicella zoster virus . ", "Treatment": "Strong anti-inflammatory drugs called steroids (such as prednisone) are usually prescribed for 5 - 7 days. Antiviral medications, such as acyclovir or valacyclovir, can be given for 7 - 10 days, although the benefit of antiviral medications is uncertain.Sometimes strong painkillers are also needed if the pain continues even with steroids. While you have weakness of the face, wear an eye patch to prevent injury to the cornea (corneal abrasion) and other damage to the eye if the eye does not close completely. Some people may use a special eye lubricant at night and artificial tears during the day to prevent the eye from drying out.If you have dizziness, your doctor can recommend other medications.", "Causes": "The varicella zoster virus that causes Ramsay Hunt syndrome is the same virus that causes chickenpox and shingles.In people with Ramsay Hunt syndrome, the virus is believed to infect the facial nerve near the inner ear. This leads to irritation and swelling of the nerve.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent Ramsay Hunt syndrome, but treating it with medication soon after symptoms develop can improve recovery."}, "Rat-bite fever": {"description": "Rat-bite fever is a rare bacterial disease spread by infected rodents.", "Possible Complications": "Rat-bite fever may cause these complications: Abscesses of the brain or soft tissue, Infection of the heart valves, Inflammation of the parotid (salivary) glands, Inflammation of the tendons, Inflammation of the heart lining . ", "Symptoms": ["Chills", "Fever", "Joint pain, redness, or swelling", "Rash ", "Chills", "Fever", "Open sore at the site of the bite", "Rash with red or purple patches\u00a0and bumps", "Swollen lymph nodes near the bite "], "Exams and Tests": "This condition is diagnosed by detecting the bacteria in:Skin, Blood, Joint fluid, Lymph nodes . Blood antibody tests and other techniques may also be used.", "Treatment": "Rat-bite fever is treated with antibiotics for 7 to 14 days.", "Causes": "Rat-bite fever can be caused by 2 different bacteria, Streptobacillus moniliformis or Spirillum minus. Both of these are found in the mouths of rodents.The disease is most often seen in:Asia, Europe, North America . Most people get rat-bite fever through contact with urine or fluids from the mouth, eye, or nose of an infected animal. This most commonly occurs through a bite, yet some cases may occur simply through contact with these fluids.A rat is usually the source of the infection. Other animals that may cause this infection include: Gerbils, Squirrels, Weasels . ", "Prevention": "Avoiding contact with rats or rat-contaminated dwellings may help prevent rat-bite fever. Taking antibiotics by mouth after a rat bite may also help prevent this illness."}, "Relapsing fever": {"description": "Relapsing fever is an infection transmitted by a louse or tick. It is characterized by repeated episodes of fever.", "Possible Complications": "These complications may occur:Drooping of the face, Coma, Liver problems, Inflammation of the thin tissue that surrounds the brain and spinal cord, Inflammation of the heart muscle, which may lead to irregular heart rate , Pneumonia, Seizures, Stupor, Shock related to taking antibiotics (Jarisch-Herxheimer's reaction, in which the rapid death of very large numbers of Borreliabacteria causes shock), Weakness, Widespread bleeding . ", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding", "Coma", "Headache", "Joint aches, muscle aches", "Nausea and vomiting", "Sagging on one\u00a0side of the face (facial droop)", "Stiff neck", "Sudden high fever, shaking chills, seizure", "Vomiting", "Weakness, unsteady while walking "], "Exams and Tests": "Relapsing fever should be suspected if someone coming from a high-risk area has repeated episodes of fever. This is especially true if the fever is followed by a \"crisis\" stage, and if the person may have been exposed to lice or soft-bodied ticks.Tests that may be done include:Blood smear to determine the cause of the infection, Blood antibody tests (sometimes used, but their usefulness is limited) . ", "Treatment": "Antibiotics are used to treat this condition.", "Causes": "Relapsing fever is an infection caused by several species of bacteria in the Borrelia family.There are 2 major forms of relapsing fever:Tick-borne relapsing fever (TBRF) is transmitted by the Ornithodoros tick. It occurs in Africa, Spain, Saudi Arabia, Asia, and certain areas in the western United States and Canada. The bacteria species associated with TBRF are Borrelia duttoni, Borrelia hermsii, and Borrelia parkerii., Louse-borne relapsing fever (LBRF) is transmitted by body lice. It is most common in Asia, Africa, and Central and South America. The bacteria species associated with LBRF is Borrelia recurrentis. . Sudden fever occurs within 2 weeks of infection. In TRBF, multiple episodes of fever occur, and each may last up to 3 days. People may not have a fever for up to 2 weeks, and then it returns., In LBRF, the fever usually lasts 3 to 6 days. It is often followed by a single, milder episode of fever. . In both forms, the fever episode may end in \"crisis.\" This consists of shaking chills, followed by intense sweating, falling body temperature, and low blood pressure. This stage may result in death.In the United States, TBRF often occurs west of the Mississippi River, particularly in the mountains of the West and the high deserts and plains of the Southwest. In the mountains of California, Utah, Arizona, New Mexico, Colorado, Oregon, and Washington, infections are usually caused by Borrelia hermsii and are often picked up in cabins in forests. The risk may now extend into the southeastern United States.LBRF is mainly a disease of the developing world. It is currently seen in Ethiopia and Sudan. Famine, war, and the movement of refugee groups often results in LBRF epidemics.", "Prevention": "Wearing clothing that fully\u00a0covers the arms and legs when you are outdoors\u00a0can help prevent TBRF\u00a0infection. Insect repellent such as DEET on the skin and clothing also work. Tick and lice control in high-risk areas is another important public health measure."}, "Rhubarb leaves poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty", "Burning in the mouth", "Burning in the throat", "Coma", "Diarrhea", "Eye pain", "Kidney stones", "Nausea", "Red-colored urine", "Seizures", "Stomach pain", "Vomiting", "Weakness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Do not touch or eat any plant with which you are not familiar. Wash your hands after working in the garden or walking in the woods."}, "Retinopathy of prematurity": {"description": "Retinopathy of prematurity (ROP) is abnormal blood vessel development in the retina of the eye. It occurs in infants that are born too early (premature).", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include severe nearsightedness and blindness.", "Symptoms": ["Stage I: There is mildly abnormal blood vessel growth.", "Stage II: Blood vessel growth is moderately abnormal.", "Stage III: Blood vessel growth is severely abnormal.", "Stage IV: Blood vessel growth is severely abnormal and there is a partially detached retina.", "Stage V: There is a total retinal detachment. ", "Abnormal eye movements", "Crossed eyes", "Severe nearsightedness", "White-looking pupils (leukocoria) "], "Exams and Tests": "Babies that are born before 30 weeks, weigh less than 3 lbs at birth, or are high risk for other reasons should have retinal exams.The first exam usually should be 4 - 9 weeks after birth, depending on the baby\u2019s gestational age. Babies born at 27 weeks or later usually have their exam at 4 weeks of age. , Those born earlier usually have exams later.. Follow-up exams are based on the results of the first exam. Babies do not need another exam if the blood vessels in both retinas have completed normal development.Parents should know what follow-up eye exams are needed before the baby leaves the nursery.", "Treatment": "Early treatment has been shown to improve a baby\u2019s chances for normal vision. Treatment should start within 72 hours of the eye exam.Some babies with \"plus disease\" need immediate treatment.Laser therapy (photocoagulation) or cryotherapy (freezing) may be used to prevent complications of advanced ROP. , The laser stops the abnormal blood vessels from growing. , The treatment can be done in the nursery using portable equipment. To work well, it must be done before the retina develops scarring or detaches from the rest of the eye. . Surgery is needed if the retina detaches. Surgery does not always result in good vision. ", "Causes": "The blood vessels of the retina begin to develop about 3 months into pregnancy. They complete development at the time of normal birth. The eyes may not develop properly if a baby is born very early. The vessels may stop growing or grow abnormally from the retina into the back of the eye. The vessels are fragile. They can leak and cause bleeding in the eye.Scar tissue may develop and pull the retina loose from the inner surface of the eye. In severe cases, this can result in vision loss.In the past, the use of too much oxygen in treating premature babies caused vessels to grow abnormally. Better methods are now available for monitoring oxygen, so this problem is rare.Today, the risk of developing ROP depends on the degree of prematurity. Smaller babies with more medical problems are at higher risk. Almost all babies who are born before 30 weeks or weigh fewer than 3 pounds at birth are screened for the condition. Some high-risk babies who weigh 3 - 4.5 pounds or who are born after 30 weeks should also be screened.In addition to prematurity, other risks factors may include:Brief stop in breathing (apnea), Heart disease, High carbon dioxide (CO2) in the blood, Infection, Low blood acidity (pH), Low blood oxygen, Respiratory distress, Slow heart rate (bradycardia), Transfusions. The rate of ROP in most premature infants has gone down greatly due to better care in the neonatal intensive care unit (NICU). However, more babies born very early are now able to survive. Since these very premature infants are at the highest risk for ROP, the problem is being seen more often. ", "Prevention": "The best way to prevent this condition is to take steps to avoid premature birth. Preventing other problems of prematurity may also help prevent ROP."}, "Rumination disorder": {"description": "Rumination disorder is a condition in which a person keeps bringing up food from the stomach into the mouth (regurgitation) and rechewing the food.", "Possible Complications": "Failure to thrive, Lowered resistance to disease, Malnutrition. ", "Symptoms": ["Repeatedly bringing up (regurgitating) food", "Repeatedly rechewing food"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider must first rule out physical causes, such as hiatal hernia, pyloric stenosis, and gastrointestinal system abnormalities that are present from birth (congenital). These conditions can be mistaken for rumination disorder.Rumination disorder can cause malnutrition. The following lab tests can measure how severe the malnutrition is and determine what nutrients need to be increased:Blood test for anemia, Endocrine - hormone functions, Serum electrolytes. ", "Treatment": "Rumination disorder is treated with behavioral techniques. One treatment associates bad consequences with rumination and good consequences with more appropriate behavior (mild aversive training).Other techniques include improving the environment (if there is abuse or neglect) and counseling the parents.", "Causes": "Rumination disorder usually starts after age 3 months, following a period of normal digestion. It occurs in infants and is rare in children and teenagers. The cause is often unknown. Certain problems, such as lack of stimulation of the infant, neglect, and high-stress family situations, have been associated with the disorder.Rumination disorder may also occur in adults.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention. However, normal stimulation and healthy parent-child relationships may help reduce the odds of rumination disorder."}, "Russell-Silver syndrome": {"description": "Russell-Silver syndrome is a disorder present at birth involving poor growth. One side of the body also will appear to be larger than the other.", "Possible Complications": "A person with Russell-Silver syndrome may have these problems:Chewing or speaking difficulty if jaw is very small, Learning disabilities . ", "Symptoms": ["Birthmarks that are the color of coffee with milk (cafe-au-lait\u00a0marks)", "Curving of the pinky toward the ring finger", "Delayed bone age", "Failure to thrive", "Gastroesophageal reflux disease", "Kidney problems, such as: Horseshoe kidney, Hydronephrosis, Posterior urethral valves, and Renal tubular acidosis", "Low birth weight", "Large head for body size", "Poor growth", "Short arms", "Short height", "Short, stubby fingers and toes", "Delayed stomach emptying, and constipation", "Wide forehead with a small triangle-shaped face and small, narrow chin "], "Exams and Tests": "The condition is usually diagnosed by early childhood. The\u00a0health care provider\u00a0will perform a physical exam. Signs include:Pointed chin that is not fully developed, Thin, wide mouth, Triangle-shaped face with broad forehead . There are no specific laboratory tests to diagnose Russell-Silver syndrome. Diagnosis is usually based on the judgment of your child's health care provider. However, the following tests may be done:Blood sugar (some children may have low blood sugar), Bone age testing (bone age is often younger than the child's actual age), Chromosome\u00a0testing (may detect a chromosomal problem), Growth hormone (some children may have a deficiency), Skeletal survey (to rule out other conditions that may mimic Russell-Silver syndrome) . ", "Treatment": "Growth hormone replacement may help if this hormone is lacking. Other treatments include:Making sure the person gets enough calories, to prevent low blood sugar and promote growth, Physical therapy, to improve muscle tone, Special education, to address learning disabilities and attention deficit problems the child may have\u00a0. Many specialists may be involved in treating a person with this condition. They include:A doctor specializing in genetics\u00a0to help diagnose Russell-Silver syndrome, A gastroenterologist or nutritionist\u00a0to help develop the proper diet to enhance growth, An endocrinologist\u00a0to prescribe growth hormone, A genetic counselor and psychologist . ", "Causes": "One in 10 children with this syndrome\u00a0has a problem involving chromosome 7. In other people with\u00a0the syndrome, it may affect chromosome 11.Most of the time, it occurs in people with no family history of the disease.The estimated number of people who develop this condition varies greatly. Males and females are equally affected."}, "Rickets": {"description": "Rickets is a disorder caused by a lack of vitamin D, calcium, or phosphate. It leads to softening and weakening of the bones.", "Possible Complications": "Chronic skeletal pain\r\n, Skeletal deformities\r\n, Skeletal fractures, may occur without cause. ", "Symptoms": ["Bone pain or tenderness\u00a0in the arms, legs, pelvis, and spine\u00a0", "Decreased muscle tone (loss of muscle strength) and weakness that gets worse", "Dental deformities, including delayed tooth formation, defects in the tooth structure, holes in the enamel, and increased cavities\u00a0(dental caries)", "Impaired growth", "Increased bone fractures", "Muscle cramps", "Short stature (adults less than 5 feet tall)", "Skeletal deformities such as an odd-shaped skull,\u00a0bowlegs, bumps in the ribcage (rachitic rosary), breastbone that is pushed forward (pigeon chest), pelvic deformities, and spine deformities (spine that curves abnormally, including scoliosis or kyphosis) "], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam reveals tenderness or pain in the bones, but not in the joints or muscles.The following tests may help diagnose rickets:Arterial blood gases, Blood tests (serum calcium), Bone biopsy (rarely done), Bone x-rays, Serum alkaline phosphatase, Serum phosphorus. Other tests and procedures include the following:Alkaline phosphatase (ALP) isoenzyme, Calcium (ionized), PTH, Urine calcium. ", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to relieve symptoms and correct the cause of the condition. The cause must be treated to prevent the disease from returning.Replacing calcium, phosphorus, or vitamin D that is lacking will eliminate most symptoms of rickets. Dietary sources of vitamin D include fish, liver, and processed milk. Exposure to moderate amounts of sunlight is encouraged. If rickets is caused by a metabolic problem, a prescription for vitamin D supplements may be needed.Positioning or bracing may be used to reduce or prevent deformities. Some skeletal deformities may require corrective surgery.", "Causes": "Vitamin D helps the body control calcium and phosphate levels. If the blood levels of these minerals become too low, the body may produce hormones that cause calcium and phosphate to be released from the bones. This leads to weak and soft bones.Vitamin D is absorbed from food or produced by the skin when exposed to sunlight. Lack of vitamin D production by the skin may occur in people who:Live in climates with little exposure to sunlight, Must stay indoors, Work indoors during the daylight hours. You may not get enough vitamin D from your diet if you:Are lactose intolerant (have trouble digesting milk products), Do not drink milk products, Follow a vegetarian diet. Infants who are breastfed only may develop vitamin D deficiency. Human breast milk does not supply the proper amount of vitamin D. This can be a particular problem for darker-skinned children in winter months (when there are lower levels of sunlight).Not getting enough calcium and phosphorous in your diet can also lead to rickets. Rickets caused by a lack of these minerals in diet is rare in developed countries, because calcium and phosphorous are found in milk and green vegetables.Your genes may increase your risk of rickets. Hereditary rickets is a form of the disease that is passed down through families. It occurs when the kidneys are unable to hold onto the mineral phosphate. Rickets may also be caused by kidney disorders that involve renal tubular acidosis.Disorders that reduce the digestion or absorption of fats will make it more difficult for vitamin D to be absorbed into the body.Occasionally, rickets may occur in children who have disorders of the liver, or who cannot convert vitamin D to its active form.Rickets is rare in the United States. It is most likely to occur in children during periods of rapid growth, when the body needs high levels of calcium and phosphate. Rickets may be seen in children ages 6 - 24 months. It is uncommon in newborns.", "Prevention": "You can prevent rickets by making sure that your child gets enough calcium, phosphorus, and vitamin D in the diet. People who have gastrointestinal or other disorders may need to take supplements. Ask your child's health care provider.Kidney (renal) causes of poor vitamin D absorption should be treated right away. People who have renal disorders should have their calcium and phosphorus levels monitored regularly.Genetic counseling may help people who have a family history of inherited disorders that can cause rickets."}, "Riley-Day syndrome": {"description": "Riley-Day syndrome is an inherited disorder that affects\u00a0nerves throughout the body.", "Possible Complications": "The following complications are possible:Blotching of the face and torso, Excessive sweating of the head and torso, High blood pressure and rapid heart rate, Insomnia, Irritability, Patchy skin tone on the hands and feet, Nausea and vomiting, Severe problems swallowing, drooling, Worsening of muscle tone . ", "Symptoms": ["Breath-holding spells (can lose consciousness)", "Constipation", "Decrease in sense of taste", "Diarrhea", "Dry eyes", "Feeding problems", "Inability to feel pain and changes in temperature (can lead to injuries)", "Lack of tears when crying", "Long periods of vomiting", "Poor coordination and unsteady walk", "Poor growth", "Repeated fevers", "Repeated pneumonia", "Seizures", "Skin blotching", "Sweating while eating", "Unusually smooth, pale tongue surface "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will do a physical exam to look for:Absent or decreased deep tendon reflexes, Lack of a response after receiving a histamine injection (normally redness and swelling would occur), Lack of tears with crying, Low muscle tone, especially in babies, Repeated episodes of high blood pressure, Severe curving of the spine (scoliosis) , Tiny pupils after receiving certain eye drops. Blood tests are available to check for the gene mutation that causes Riley-Day syndrome.", "Treatment": "Treatment may include:Therapy to help prevent seizures, Feeding in an upright position and giving textured formula to prevent gastroesophageal reflux (stomach acid and food coming back up, also called GERD), Measures to prevent low blood pressure when standing, such as increasing intake of fluid, salt, and caffeine, and wearing elastic stockings , Medicines to control vomiting, Medicines to prevent dry eyes, Physical therapy of the chest, Measures to protect against injury, Providing enough nutrition and fluids, Surgery or spinal fusion, Treating aspiration pneumonia. ", "Causes": "Riley-Day syndrome is passed down through families (inherited). A person must inherit a copy of the defective gene from each parent to develop the condition.This condition occurs most often in people of Eastern European Jewish ancestry (Ashkenazi Jews). It is caused by a change (mutation) to a gene. It is rare in the general population.", "Prevention": "Genetic DNA testing is very accurate for Riley-Day syndrome. It may be used for diagnosing people with the condition or those who carry the gene. It can also be used for prenatal diagnosis. People of Eastern European Jewish background and families with a history of Riley-Day syndrome may wish to seek genetic counseling if they are thinking of having children."}, "Rickettsial pox": {"description": "Rickettsial pox is a disease spread by a mite. It causes a chickenpox-like rash on the body.", "Possible Complications": "There are usually no complications if the\u00a0infection is treated.", "Symptoms": ["Discomfort in bright light (photophobia)", "Fever and chills", "Muscle pain (myalgia)", "Rash that looks like chickenpox", "Sweating "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will do an examination to look for a rash similar to the one in chickenpox.Tests include:Complete blood count (CBC), Tests of blood serum (serologic studies). ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to cure the infection by taking antibiotics.", "Causes": "Rickettsial pox is caused by the bacteria, Rickettsia akari. It is commonly found in the United States in New York City and other city areas. It also has been seen in South Africa, Korea, and Russia.The bacteria are spread by the bite of a mite that lives on mice.", "Prevention": "Sanitary measures, especially controlling mice and their parasites, will prevent the spread of rickettsial pox."}, "Roseola": {"description": "Roseola is a viral infection that commonly affects infants and young children. It involves a pinkish-red skin rash and high fever.", "Possible Complications": "Aseptic meningitis (rare), Encephalitis (rare), Febrile seizure. ", "Symptoms": ["Eye redness", "Irritability", "Runny nose", "Sore throat", "High fever, that comes on quickly and may be as high as 105\u00b0 Fahrenheit and can last 3 to 7 days ", "Starts on the middle of the body and spreads to the arms, legs, neck, and face.", "Pink or rose-colored,", "Has small sores that are slightly raised "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask questions about the child's medical history. The child may have swollen lymph nodes in the neck or back of the scalp.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for roseola. The disease usually gets better on its own without complications.Acetaminophen (Tylenol) and cool sponge baths can help reduce the fever. Some children may have seizures when they get high fevers. If this occurs, call your doctor or go to the closest emergency room.", "Causes": "Roseola is common in children ages 3 months to 4 years, and most common in those ages 6 months to 1 year.It is caused by a virus called human herpesvirus 6 (HHV-6), although similar syndromes are possible with other viruses.", "Prevention": "Careful handwashing can help prevent the spread of the viruses that cause roseola."}, "Rubinstein-Taybi syndrome": {"description": "Rubinstein-Taybi syndrome (RTS) is a genetic disease that involves broad thumbs and toes, short stature, distinctive facial features, and varying degrees of intellectual disability.", "Possible Complications": "Complications depend on what part of the body is affected. Complications may include:Feeding problems in infants, Repeated ear infections and hearing loss, Problems with the shape of the heart, Abnormal heartbeat, Scarring of the skin . ", "Symptoms": ["Broadening of the thumbs and big toes", "Constipation", "Excess hair on body (hirsutism)", "Heart defects possibly requiring surgery", "Intellectual disability", "Seizures", "Short stature that is noticeable after birth", "Slow development of cognitive skills", "Slow development of motor skills accompanied by low muscle tone", "Absent or extra kidney, and other problems with kidney or bladder", "An underdeveloped bone in the midface", "Unsteady or stiff walking gait", "\r\n  Downward-slanted eyes\r\n  ", "Low-set ears or malformed ears", "Drooping eyelid (ptosis)", "Cataracts", "Coloboma (a defect in the iris of the eye)", "Macrocephaly (excessively large head) or microcephaly (excessively small head)", "Narrow, small, or recessed mouth with crowded teeth", "Prominent or \"beaked\" nose", "Thick and arched eyebrows with long eyelashes", "Undescended testicle (cryptorchidism), or other testicular problems"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. Blood tests and x-rays may also be done.Genetic tests can be done to determine if the genes involved in this disease are missing or changed.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for Rubinstein-Taybi syndrome. Surgery to repair the bones in the thumbs or toes can sometimes improve grasp or relieve discomfort.", "Causes": "Rubinstein-Taybi syndrome is a rare condition. Defects in the genes CREBBP and EP300 are seen in some people with this condition.Some patients, typically with more severe problems, are missing the gene entirely.Most cases are sporadic (not passed down through families) and likely due to a new genetic defect that occurs either in the sperm or egg cells, or at the time of conception.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is advised for couples with a family history of this disease who are planning a pregnancy."}, "Radiation sickness": {"Symptoms": ["Bleeding from the nose, mouth, gums, and rectum", "Bloody stool", "Bruising", "Confusion", "Dehydration", "Diarrhea", "Fainting", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Hair loss", "Inflammation of exposed areas (redness, tenderness, swelling, bleeding)", "Mouth ulcers", "Nausea and vomiting", "Open sores on the skin", "Skin burns (redness, blistering)", "Sloughing of skin", "Ulcers in the esophagus, stomach or intestines", "Vomiting blood", "Weakness"], "Causes": "The causes include:Accidental exposure to high doses of radiation such as a nuclear power plant accidents , Exposure to excessive radiation for medical treatments. ", "description": "There are two basic types of radiation: ionizing and nonionizing.", "Prevention": "Avoid unnecessary exposure to radiation., Persons working in radiation hazard areas should wear badges to measure their exposure levels., Protective shields should always be placed over the parts of the body not being treated or studied during x-ray imaging tests or radiation therapy.. "}, "Radiation enteritis": {"description": "Radiation enteritis is damage to the lining of the intestines (bowels) caused by radiation therapy, which is a type of cancer treatment.", "Possible Complications": "Bleeding and anemia, Dehydration, Iron deficiency, Malabsorption, Malnutrition, Weight loss . ", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding or mucus from the rectum", "Diarrhea or watery stools", "Feeling the need to have a bowel movement most or all of the time", "Pain in the rectal area, especially during bowel movements ", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea and vomiting ", "Abdominal pain", "Bloody diarrhea", "Greasy or fatty stools", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will do a physical exam and ask questions about your medical history.Tests may include:Barium x-ray examination, Sigmoidoscopy or colonoscopy, Upper endoscopy. ", "Treatment": "Starting a low-fiber diet on the first day of radiation treatment may help you avoid problems. The best choice of foods depends on your symptoms. Some things can make symptoms worse, and should be avoided. These include: Alcohol and tobacco, Almost all milk products, Coffee, tea, chocolate, and sodas with caffeine, Foods containing whole bran, Fresh and dried fruits, Fried, greasy, or fatty foods, Nuts and seeds, Popcorn, potato chips, and pretzels, Raw vegetables, Rich pastries and baked goods, Some fruit juices, Strong spices . Foods and drinks that are better choices include:Apple or grape juice, Applesauce, peeled apples, and bananas, Eggs, buttermilk, and yogurt, Fish, poultry, and meat that has been broiled or roasted, Mild, cooked vegetables, such as asparagus tips, green or black beans, carrots, spinach, and squash, Potatoes that have been baked, boiled, or mashed, Processed cheeses, such as American cheese, Smooth peanut butter, White bread, macaroni, or noodles . Your doctor may have you use certain medicines such as:Drugs that help decrease diarrhea, such as loperamide, Pain medicines, Steroid foam that coats the lining of the rectum, Special enzymes to replace enzymes from the pancreas . Other things you can do include:Eating foods at room temperature, Eating small meals more often, Drink plenty of fluids (up to 12 8-ounce glasses) every day when you have diarrhea. Some people will need fluids given through a vein (intravenous fluids).. Your health care provider may choose to\u00a0decrease your radiation for a short period of time.There often are no good treatments for chronic radiation enteritis. However, medicines such as cholestyramine, diphenoxylate-atropine, loperamide, or sucralfate may help. You may need to consider surgery to either remove or go around (bypass) a section of damaged intestine.", "Causes": "Radiation therapy uses high-powered x-rays, particles, or radioactive seeds to kill cancer cells. The therapy may also damage healthy cells in the lining of the intestines.People who have radiation therapy to the belly or pelvic area are at risk. These may include people with cervical, pancreatic, prostate, uterine, or colon and rectal cancer."}, "Refrigerant poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty", "Throat swelling (which may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Loss of vision", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Burns of the esophagus (food pipe)", "Vomiting blood", "Blood in the stool", "Irregular heart rhythms", "Collapse", "Irritation", "Burn", "Necrosis (holes) in the skin or underlying tissues"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all poisons in childproof containers, with original labels, and out of the reach of children."}, "Renal cell carcinoma": {"description": "Renal cell carcinoma is a type of kidney cancer that starts in the lining of very small tubes (tubules) in the kidney.", "Possible Complications": "High blood pressure (hypertension), Too much calcium in the blood, High red blood cell count, Liver problems, Spread of the cancer. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain and swelling", "Back pain", "Blood in the urine", "Swelling of the veins around a testicle (varicocele)", "Flank pain", "Weight loss", "Excessive hair growth in females", "Pale skin", "Vision problems"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. This may reveal:Mass or swelling of the abdomen, A varicocele in the male scrotum . Tests include:Abdominal CT scan, \r\n  Blood chemistry\r\n  , \r\n  Complete blood count (CBC), Intravenous pyelogram (IVP), Liver function tests, Renal arteriography, Ultrasound of the abdomen and kidney, Urine tests . The following tests may be done to see if the cancer has spread:Abdominal CT scan, Abdominal MRI, Bone scan, Chest x-ray, Chest CT scan, PET scan. ", "Treatment": "Surgery to remove of all or part of the kidney (nephrectomy) is recommended. This may include removing the bladder, surrounding tissues, or lymph nodes. A cure is unlikely unless all of the cancer is removed with surgery. But even if some cancer is left behind, patients can still benefit from surgery.Hormone treatments may make the tumor smaller in some cases.Chemotherapy is generally not effective for treating kidney cancer. The immune system medicine interleukin-2 (IL-2) may help some patients. Medicines that target the development of blood vessels that feed the tumor may be used to treat kidney cancer. Your doctor can tell you more.Radiation therapy usually does not work for kidney cancer. ", "Causes": "Renal cell carcinoma is the most common type of kidney cancer in adults. It occurs most often in men ages 50 to 70.The exact cause is unknown.The following may increase your risk of kidney cancer:Dialysis treatment, Family history of the disease, High blood pressure, Horseshoe kidney, Polycystic kidney disease, Smoking, Von Hippel-Lindau disease (a hereditary disease that affects blood vessels in the brain, eyes, and other body parts) . ", "Prevention": "Stop smoking. Follow your health care provider's recommendations in the treatment of kidney disorders, especially those that may require dialysis."}, "Retrograde ejaculation": {"description": "Retrograde ejaculation occurs when semen enters the bladder instead of going out through the urethra during ejaculation.", "Possible Complications": "The condition may cause infertility. However, semen can often be removed from the bladder and used during assistive reproductive techniques to achieve a pregnancy. ", "Symptoms": ["Cloudy urine after orgasms", "Little or no semen is released during ejaculation "], "Exams and Tests": "A urinalysis that is taken soon after ejaculation will show a large amount of sperm in the urine.", "Treatment": "Your health care provider may recommend that you stop taking any medicines that may cause retrograde ejaculation. This can make the problem go away.Retrograde ejaculation that is caused by diabetes or surgery may be treated with medications such as pseudoephedrine or imipramine.", "Causes": "Retrograde ejaculation\u00a0is uncommon. The main reason it occurs is that the bladder neck does not close. This causes semen to go backwards into the bladder rather than forward out of the penis.Retrograde ejaculation may also be caused by:Diabetes, Some medications, including drugs used to treat high blood pressure (hypertension) and some mood-altering drugs, Medications or surgery\u00a0to treat prostate or urethra problems. ", "Prevention": "Maintaining good blood sugar control may help prevent this condition in men who have diabetes. Avoiding drugs that cause retrograde ejaculation will also prevent this condition."}, "Respiratory acidosis": {"description": "Respiratory acidosis is a condition that occurs when the lungs cannot remove all of the carbon dioxide the body produces. This causes body fluids, especially the blood, to become too acidic.", "Possible Complications": "Poor organ function, Respiratory failure, Shock. ", "Symptoms": ["Confusion", "Easy fatigue", "Lethargy", "Shortness of breath", "Sleepiness"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. Tests that may be done include:Arterial blood gas, which measures oxygen and carbon dioxide levels in the blood, Basic metabolic panel, Chest x-ray, CT scan of the chest, Pulmonary function test. ", "Treatment": "Treatment is aimed at the underlying disease, and may include:Bronchodilator drugs to reverse some types of airway obstruction, Noninvasive positive-pressure ventilation (sometimes called CPAP or BiPAP) or a breathing machine, if needed, Oxygen if the blood oxygen level is low, Treatment to stop smoking. ", "Causes": "Causes of respiratory acidosis include:Diseases of the airways (such as asthma and chronic obstructive lung disease), Diseases of the chest (such as scoliosis), Diseases affecting the nerves and muscles that \"signal\" the lungs to inflate or deflate, Drugs that suppress breathing (including powerful pain medicines, such as narcotics, and \"downers,\" such as benzodiazepines), especially when combined with alcohol, Severe obesity, which restricts how much the lungs can expand, Obstructive sleep apnea. Chronic respiratory acidosis occurs over a long period of time. This leads to a stable situation, because the kidneys increase body chemicals, such as bicarbonate, that help restore the body's acid-base balance.Acute respiratory acidosis is a condition in which carbon dioxide builds up very quickly, before the kidneys can return the body to a state of balance.Some people with chronic respiratory acidosis get acute respiratory acidosis because an illness makes their condition worse.", "Prevention": "Do not smoke. Smoking leads to the development of many severe lung diseases that can cause respiratory acidosis.Losing weight may help prevent respiratory acidosis due to obesity (obesity-hypoventilation syndrome).Be careful about taking sedating medicines, and never combine these medicines with alcohol."}, "Reflux nephropathy": {"description": "Reflux nephropathy is a condition in which the kidneys are damaged by the backward flow of urine into the kidney.", "Possible Complications": "Blockage of the ureter after surgery, Chronic kidney disease, Chronic or repeat urinary tract infections, Chronic kidney failure if both kidneys are involved (can progress to end-stage kidney disease), Kidney infection, High blood pressure, Nephrotic syndrome, Persistent reflux, Scarring of the kidneys. ", "Symptoms": ["Chronic kidney failure", "Nephrotic syndrome", "Urinary tract infection"], "Exams and Tests": "Reflux nephropathy is often found when a child is checked for repeated bladder infections. If vesicoureteral reflux is discovered, the child's siblings may also be checked, because reflux can run in families.The blood pressure may be high, and there may be signs and symptoms of chronic kidney disease.Blood and urine tests will be done, and may include:BUN - blood, Creatinine - blood, Creatinine clearance -- urine and blood, Urinalysis or 24-hour urine studies, Urine culture. Imaging tests that may be done include:Abdominal CT scan, Bladder ultrasound, Intravenous pyelogram (IVP), Kidney ultrasound, Radionuclide cystogram, Retrograde pyelogram, Voiding cystourethrogram. ", "Treatment": "Vesicoureteral reflux is separated into five different grades. Simple or mild reflux often falls into grade I or II. The severity of the reflux and amount of damage to the kidney help determine treatment.Simple, uncomplicated vesicoureteral reflux (called primary reflux) can be treated with:Antibiotics taken every day to prevent urinary tract infections, Careful monitoring of kidney function, Repeated urine cultures, Yearly ultrasound of the kidneys . Controlling blood pressure is the most important way to slow kidney damage. The health care provider may prescribe medicines to control high blood pressure. Angiotensin-converting enzyme (ACE) inhibitors and angiotensin receptor blockers (ARBs) are often used.Surgery is usually only used in children who have not responded to medical therapy.More severe vesicoureteral reflux may need surgery, especially in children who do not respond to medical therapy. Surgery to place the ureter back into the bladder (ureteral reimplantation) can stop reflux nephropathy in some cases.More severe reflux may need reconstructive surgery. This type of surgery may reduce the number and severity of urinary tract infections.If needed, patients will be treated for chronic kidney disease.", "Causes": "Urine flows from each kidney through tubes called ureters and into the bladder. When the bladder is full, it squeezes and sends the urine out through the urethra. None of the urine should flow back into the ureter when the bladder is squeezing. Each ureter has a one-way valve where it enters the bladder that prevents urine from flowing back up the ureter.But in some people, urine flows back up to the kidney. This is called vesicoureteral reflux.Over time, the kidneys may be damaged or scarred by this reflux. This is called reflux nephropathyReflux can occur in people whose ureters do not attach properly to the bladder or whose valves do not work well. Children may be born with this problem or may have other birth defects of the urinary system that cause reflux nephropathy.Reflux nephropathy can occur with other conditions that lead to a blockage of urine flow, including:Bladder outlet obstruction, such as an enlarged prostate in men, Bladder stones, Neurogenic bladder, which can occur in people with multiple sclerosis, spinal cord injury, or other nervous system (neurological) conditions. Reflux nephropathy also can occur from swelling of the ureters after a kidney transplant or from injury to the ureter.Risk factors for reflux nephropathy include: Abnormalities of the urinary tract, Personal or family history of vesicoureteral reflux, Repeat urinary tract infections. ", "Prevention": "Quickly treating conditions that cause reflux of urine into the kidney may prevent reflux nephropathy."}, "Renal vein thrombosis": {"description": "Renal vein thrombosis is a blood clot that develops in the vein that drains blood from the kidney.", "Possible Complications": "Acute renal failure (especially if thrombosis occurs in a dehydrated child), End stage renal disease, Blood clot moves to the lungs (pulmonary embolism), Formation of new blood clots . ", "Symptoms": ["Blood clot to the lung", "Bloody urine", "Decreased urine output", "Flank pain or low back pain"], "Exams and Tests": "An exam may not reveal the specific problem. However, it may indicate nephrotic syndrome or other causes of renal vein thrombosis.Tests include:Abdominal CT scan, Abdominal MRI, Abdominal ultrasound, Duplex Doppler exam of the renal veins, Urinalysis may show protein in the urine or red blood cells in the urine, X-ray of the kidney veins (venography) . ", "Treatment": "The treatment is focused on preventing new clot formations and reducing the risk of the clot traveling to other locations in the body (embolization).You may get medicines that prevent blood clotting (anticoagulants). Your doctor may have rest in bed or cut down on activity for a short time. If sudden kidney failure develops you may need dialysis for a short period.", "Causes": "Renal vein thrombosis is an uncommon disorder. It may be caused by:Abdominal aortic aneurysm, Hypercoaguable state: clotting disorders, Dehydration (mostly in infants), Estrogen use, Nephrotic syndrome, Pregnancy, Scar formation with pressure on the renal vein, Trauma (to the back or abdomen), Tumor. In adults, the most common cause is nephrotic syndrome. In infants, the most common cause is dehydration.", "Prevention": "In most cases, there is no specific way to prevent renal vein thrombosis. Keeping enough fluids in the body may help reduce risk.Aspirin is sometimes used to prevent renal vein thrombosis in people who have had a kidney transplant. Blood thinners such as warfarin may be recommended in some people with chronic kidney disease."}, "Rhabdomyolysis": {"description": "Rhabdomyolysis is the breakdown of muscle tissue that leads to the release of muscle fiber contents into the blood. These substances are harmful to the kidney and often cause kidney damage.", "Possible Complications": "Acute tubular necrosis, Acute renal failure, Harmful chemical imbalances in the blood, Shock (low blood pressure). ", "Symptoms": ["Dark, red, or cola-colored urine", "Decreased urine output", "General weakness", "Muscle stiffness or aching (myalgia)", "Muscle tenderness", "Weakness of the affected muscles ", "Fatigue", "Joint pain", "Seizures", "Weight gain (unintentional)"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam will show tender or damaged skeletal muscles.The following tests may be done:Creatine kinase (CK) level, Serum calcium, Serum myoglobin, Serum potassium, Urinalysis, Urine myoglobin test . This disease may also affect the results of the following tests:CK isoenzymes, Serum creatinine, Urine creatinine. ", "Treatment": "You will need to get fluids containing bicarbonate to help prevent kidney damage. You may need to get fluids through a vein (IV). Some people may need kidney dialysis.Your doctor may prescribe medicines including diuretics and bicarbonate (if there is enough urine output).Hyperkalemia and low blood calcium levels (hypocalcemia) should be treated right away. Kidney failure should also be treated.", "Causes": "When muscle is damaged, a protein called myoglobin is released into the bloodstream. It is then filtered out of the body by the kidneys. Myoglobin breaks down into substances that can damage kidney cells.Rhabdomyolysis may be caused by injury or any other condition that damages skeletal muscle.Problems that may lead to this disease include:Trauma or crush injuries, Use of drugs such as cocaine, amphetamines, statins, heroin, or PCP, Genetic muscle diseases, Extremes of body temperature, Ischemia or death of muscle tissue, Low phosphate levels, Seizures or muscle tremors, Severe exertion, such as marathon running or calisthenics, Lengthy surgical procedures, Severe dehydration . ", "Prevention": "Drink plenty of fluids after strenuous exercise. This will help to dilute your urine and flush any myoglobin that is released from your muscles out of your kidneys. Also drink a lot of fluids after any condition that may have damaged skeletal muscle."}, "Restrictive cardiomyopathy": {"Symptoms": ["Cough", "Breathing problems that occur at night, with activity or when lying flat ", "Fatigue\u00a0and inability to exercise", "Loss of appetite", "Swelling of the abdomen", "Swelling of the feet and ankles", "Uneven or rapid pulse ", "Chest pain", "Inability to concentrate", "Low urine output", "Need to urinate at night (in adults) "], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show:\r\n  Enlarged (distended) or bulging neck veins\r\n  , \r\n  Enlarged liver\r\n  , \r\n  Lung crackles and abnormal or distant heart sounds in the chest heard through a stethoscope\r\n  , \r\n  Fluid backup into the hands and feet\r\n  , \r\n  Signs of heart failure. Tests for restrictive cardiomyopathy include:Cardiac catheterization and coronary angiography, Chest CT scan, Chest x-ray, ECG (electrocardiogram), Echocardiogram and Doppler study, MRI of the heart, Nuclear heart scan (MUGA, RNV), Serum iron studies, Serum or urine protein tests . Restrictive cardiomyopathy may appear similar to constrictive pericarditis. A biopsy of the heart or cardiac catheterization may help confirm the diagnosis, but these tests are not done often.", "description": "Restrictive cardiomyopathy refers to a set of changes in how the heart muscle functions. These changes cause the heart to fill poorly (more common) or squeeze poorly (less common). Sometimes, both problems are present. ", "Causes": "In a case of\u00a0restrictive cardiomyopathy, the heart muscle is normal size or slightly enlarged. Most of the time, it also pumps normally. However, it does not relax normally during the time between heartbeats when the blood returns from the body (diastole).When the disease progresses, the heart may not pump blood strongly. The abnormal heart function can affect the lungs, liver, and other body systems. Restrictive cardiomyopathy may affect either or both of the lower heart chambers (ventricles). It is very often linked to a disease of the heart muscle.Restrictive cardiomyopathy is a rare condition. The most common causes are amyloidosis and scarring of the heart from an unknown cause (idiopathic myocardial fibrosis). It also can occur after a heart transplant.Other causes of restrictive cardiomyopathy include:Carcinoid heart disease, Diseases of the heart lining (endocardium), such as endomyocardial fibrosis and Loeffler's syndrome (rare), Iron overload (hemochromatosis), Sarcoidosis, Scarring after radiation or chemotherapy, Scleroderma, Tumors of the heart . ", "Treatment": "The condition causing the cardiomyopathy is treated when it can be found. Few treatments are known to work well for restrictive cardiomyopathy. The main goal of treatment is to control symptoms and improve quality of life.The following treatments may be used to control symptoms or prevent problems:Blood thinning medicines , Chemotherapy (in some situations), Diuretics to remove fluid and help improve breathing, Medicines to prevent or control abnormal heart rhythms, Steroids for some causes. A heart transplant may be considered if the heart function is very poor and symptoms are severe. "}, "Rheumatoid lung disease": {"description": "Rheumatoid lung disease is a group of lung problems related to rheumatoid arthritis. The condition can include:", "Possible Complications": "Pneumothorax, Pulmonary hypertension. ", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Cough", "Fever", "Shortness of breath", "Joint pain", "Joint stiffness", "Joint swelling", "Skin nodules"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor may hear crackles (rales) when listening to the lungs with a stethoscope. Or, the patient may have decreased breath sounds, wheezing, a rubbing sound, or normal breath sounds.The following tests may show signs of rheumatoid lung disease:Chest x-ray, CT scan of the chest, Echocardiogram (may show pulmonary hypertension), Lung biopsy (bronchoscopic, video-assisted, or open), Lung function tests, Needle inserted into the fluid around the lung (thoracentesis). ", "Treatment": "Many people with this condition have no symptoms. Treatment is aimed at the\u00a0health problems causing the lung problem\u00a0and the complications caused by the disorder. Corticosteroids or other medicines that suppress the immune system are sometimes useful.", "Causes": "Lung problems\u00a0are common in rheumatoid arthritis. They often cause no symptoms.The causes of lung disease associated with rheumatoid arthritis are unknown. Sometimes the medicines used to treat rheumatoid arthritis, especially methotrexate, may result in lung disease."}, "Rh incompatibility": {"description": "Rh incompatibility is a condition that develops when a pregnant woman has Rh-negative blood and the baby in her womb has Rh-positive blood.", "Possible Complications": "Possible complications include:Brain damage due to high levels of bilirubin (kernicterus), Fluid buildup and swelling in the baby (hydrops fetalis), Problems with mental function, movement, hearing, speech, and seizures. ", "Symptoms": ["Yellowing of the skin and whites of the eyes (jaundice)", "Low muscle tone (hypotonia) and lethargy"], "Exams and Tests": "Before delivery, the mother may have an increased amount of amniotic fluid around her unborn baby (polyhydramnios).There may be:A positive direct Coombs test result, Higher-than-normal levels of bilirubin in the baby's umbilical cord blood, Signs of red blood cell destruction in the infant's blood. ", "Treatment": "Because Rh incompatibility is preventable with the use of RhoGAM, prevention remains the best treatment. Treatment of an infant who is already affected depends on the severity of the condition.Infants with mild Rh incompatibility may be treated with\u00a0phototherapy using bilirubin lights. IV immune globulin may be used, but there is no conclusive evidence to show it works. \u00a0\r\n ", "Causes": "During pregnancy, red blood cells from the unborn baby can cross into the mother's bloodstream through the placenta.If the mother is Rh-negative, her immune system treats Rh-positive fetal cells as if they were a foreign substance and makes antibodies against the fetal blood cells. These anti-Rh antibodies may cross back through the placenta into the developing baby and destroy the baby's circulating red blood cells.When red blood cells are broken down, they make bilirubin. This causes an infant to become yellow (jaundiced). The level of bilirubin in the infant's bloodstream may range from mild to dangerously high.Because it takes time for the mother to develop antibodies, firstborn infants are often not affected unless the mother had past miscarriages or abortions that sensitized her immune system. However, all children she has afterwards who are also Rh-positive may be affected.Rh incompatibility develops only when the mother is Rh-negative and the infant is Rh-positive. Thanks to the use of special immune globulins called RhoGHAM, this problem has become uncommon in places that provide access to good prenatal care.", "Prevention": "Rh incompatibility is almost completely preventable. Rh-negative mothers should be followed closely by their obstetricians during pregnancy.Special immune globulins, called RhoGAM, are now used to prevent RH incompatibility in mothers who are Rh-negative.If the father of the infant is Rh-positive or if his blood type cannot be confirmed, the mother is given an injection of RhoGAM during the second trimester. If the baby is Rh-positive, the mother will get a second injection within a few days after delivery.These injections prevent the development of antibodies against Rh-positive blood. However, women with Rh-negative blood type must receive injections:During every pregnancy, If they have a miscarriage or abortion, After prenatal tests such as amniocentesis and chorionic villus biopsy, After injury to the abdomen during pregnancy. "}, "Rhabdomyosarcoma": {"description": "It can occur in many places in the body. The most common sites are the head and neck, the urogenital tract, and the arms or legs.", "Possible Complications": "Complications from chemotherapy, Location in which surgery is not possible, Metastasis. ", "Symptoms": ["Tumors in the nose or throat may cause bleeding, congestion, swallowing problems, or neurological problems if they extend into the brain.", "Tumors around the eyes may cause bulging of the eye, problems with vision, swelling around the eye, or pain.", "Tumors in the ears, may cause pain, hearing loss, or swelling.", "Bladder and vaginal tumors may cause lead to trouble starting to urinate or having a bowel movement, or poor control of urine.", "Muscle tumors may lead to a painful lump, and are often thought to be an injury. "], "Exams and Tests": "Diagnosis of rhabdomyosarcoma is often delayed because of lack of symptoms and because the tumor may appear at the same time as a recent injury. Early diagnosis is important because rhabdomyosarcoma\u00a0spreads quickly.A complete physical exam should be done. Tests may include:Biopsy of the tumor, Chest x-ray, CT scan of the chest to look for spread of the tumor, CT scan of the tumor site, Bone marrow biopsy (may show the cancer has spread), Bone scan to look for spread of the tumor, MRI scan of the tumor site, Spinal tap (lumbar puncture) . ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the site and type of rhabdomyosarcoma. Either radiation or chemotherapy, or both, will be used before or after surgery. In general, surgery and radiation therapy are used to treat the primary site of the tumor. Chemotherapy is used to treat disease at all sites in the body.Chemotherapy is an essential part of treatment to prevent further spread of the cancer. Many different chemotherapy drugs are active against rhabdomyosarcoma. Your doctor will discuss these with you.", "Causes": "Rhabdomyosarcoma is the most common soft tissue tumor in children.The cause of rhabdomyosarcoma is unknown. It is a rare tumor with only several hundred new cases per year in the United States.Some children with certain birth defects are at an increased risk. Some families have a gene mutation that increases this risk. Most children with rhabdomyosarcoma do not have any known risk factors."}}